4594 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: együtt
  EN TS: They are crying together!
  hu TS: Együtt sírnak!
  EN FS: They are dancing together!
  hu FS: Együtt táncolnak!
  EN TP: crying together
  hu TP: együtt sírva
  EN FP: singing together
  hu FP: együtt énekelve
4595 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: sírni
  EN TS: He can't stop crying.
  hu TS: Nem bírja abbahagyni a sírást.
  EN FS: He can't stop laughing.
  hu FS: Nem bírja abbahagyni a nevetést.
  EN TP: crying on the sofa
  hu TP: sírás a kanapén
  EN FP: crying in the shower
  hu FP: sírás a zuhany alatt
4596 | nose (noun): the organ of smell in the middle of the face | loc: orr
  EN TS: She is blowing her nose.
  hu TS: Kifújja az orrát.
  EN FS: She is blowing a bubble.
  hu FS: Buborékot fúj.
  EN TP: blowing her nose
  hu TP: kifújja az orrát
  EN FP: holding her nose
  hu FP: befogja az orrát
4597 | culture (noun): the tastes in art and manners of a social group | loc: kultúra
  EN TS: This culture loves dancing.
  hu TS: Ez a kultúra imádja a táncot.
  EN FS: This culture loves football.
  hu FS: Ez a kultúra imádja a focit.
  EN TP: a folk culture festival
  hu TP: a népi kultúra ünnepe
  EN FP: a culture of fast food
  hu FP: a gyorskaja-kultúra
4598 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: hatalmas
  EN TS: Her coffee mug is huge now!
  hu TS: Már hatalmas a kávésbögréje!
  EN FS: Her teapot is huge now!
  hu FS: Már hatalmas a teáskannája!
  EN TP: a huge coffee mug
  hu TP: hatalmas kávésbögre
  EN FP: a huge coffee bill
  hu FP: hatalmas kávészámla
4599 | payment (noun): a sum of money paid | loc: kifizetés
  EN TS: Payment in coins and notes.
  hu TS: Kifizetés érmékkel és bankjegyekkel.
  EN FS: Payment in notes only.
  hu FS: Kifizetés csak bankjegyekkel.
  EN TP: a payment in cash
  hu TP: kifizetés készpénzben
  EN FP: a payment by card
  hu FP: kifizetés kártyával
4600 | exchange (verb): to give something and receive something back | loc: cserélni
  EN TS: He is exchanging money.
  hu TS: Pénzt cserél.
  EN FS: He is exchanging hats.
  hu FS: Kalapokat cserél.
  EN TP: exchanging foreign money
  hu TP: külföldi pénzt cserél
  EN FP: exchanging gifts
  hu FP: ajándékokat cserél
4601 | arrange (verb): to put things into a proper order | loc: elrendezni
  EN TS: She is arranging the cushions.
  hu TS: Elrendezi a díszpárnákat.
  EN FS: She is arranging the books.
  hu FS: Elrendezi a könyveket.
  EN TP: arranging sofa cushions
  hu TP: díszpárnák elrendezése
  EN FP: arranging a meeting
  hu FP: egy találkozó leszervezése
4602 | search (verb): to search or seek something | loc: átkutatni
  EN TS: Customs is searching her bag.
  hu TS: A vámosok átkutatják a táskáját.
  EN FS: Customs is searching her car.
  hu FS: A vámosok átkutatják az autóját.
  EN TP: searching a suitcase
  hu TP: bőrönd átkutatása
  EN FP: searching for a lost dog
  hu FP: elveszett kutya keresése
4603 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: út
  EN TS: The road winds through hills.
  hu TS: Az út dombok között kanyarog.
  EN FS: The road winds through a city.
  hu FS: Az út egy városon át kanyarog.
  EN TP: a winding mountain road
  hu TP: kanyargós hegyi út
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  hu FP: kanyargós hegyi folyó
4605 | wire (noun): a metal line that carries electricity | loc: drót
  EN TS: The wire is sparking.
  hu TS: Szikrázik a drót.
  EN FS: The wheel is sparking.
  hu FS: Szikrázik a kerék.
  EN TP: an overhead tram wire
  hu TP: a villamos felső drótja
  EN FP: a farm wire fence
  hu FP: drótkerítés a farmon
4606 | tower (noun): a tall narrow building or part of one | loc: torony
  EN TS: He is looking up at a tower.
  hu TS: Felnéz egy toronyra.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  hu FS: Felnéz egy repülőre.
  EN TP: a clock on a tower
  hu TP: óra a tornyon
  EN FP: a clock on a wall
  hu FP: óra a falon
4607 | copper (noun): a reddish-brown metal that bends easily | loc: réz
  EN TS: Big copper tanks behind her.
  hu TS: Nagy réztartályok mögötte.
  EN FS: Big plastic tanks behind her.
  hu FS: Nagy műanyag tartályok mögötte.
  EN TP: shiny copper brewing tanks
  hu TP: fényes sörfőző réztartályok
  EN FP: copper coins in a jar
  hu FP: rézérmék egy befőttesüvegben
4608 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: tömeg
  EN TS: The whole crowd is vibing!
  hu TS: Az egész tömeg full bulizik!
  EN FS: The whole crowd is sleeping!
  hu FS: Az egész tömeg alszik!
  EN TP: a huge dancing crowd
  hu TP: hatalmas táncoló tömeg
  EN FP: a football crowd
  hu FP: focidrukkerek tömege
4610 | dad (noun): an informal word for father | loc: apu
  EN TS: Dad is ready to catch her!
  hu TS: Apu készen áll, hogy elkapja!
  EN FS: Mom is ready to catch her!
  hu FS: Anyu készen áll, hogy elkapja!
  EN TP: jumping into dad's arms
  hu TP: ugrás apu karjaiba
  EN FP: running away from dad
  hu FP: elszalad aputól
4611 | daughter (noun): a female child | loc: lánya
  EN TS: Her daughter drew the family.
  hu TS: A lánya lerajzolta a családot.
  EN FS: Her daughter drew a horse.
  hu FS: A lánya lerajzolt egy lovat.
  EN TP: a daughter baking with mom
  hu TP: anya és lánya sütnek
  EN FP: a daughter shopping with mom
  hu FP: anya és lánya vásárolnak
4612 | sell (verb): to give something in exchange for money | loc: eladni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He sells the best peaches.
  hu TS: Ő adja el a legjobb barackot.
  EN FS: He sells the best apples.
  hu FS: Ő adja el a legjobb almát.
  EN TP: selling peaches at a market
  hu TP: barackot ad el a piacon
  EN FP: selling apples at a market
  hu FP: almát ad el a piacon
4613 | earth (noun): the loose soft material of the land surface | loc: föld
  EN TS: He is turning the dark earth.
  hu TS: Forgatja a sötét földet.
  EN FS: He is turning the white sand.
  hu FS: Forgatja a fehér homokot.
  EN TP: turning the dark earth
  hu TP: a sötét föld forgatása
  EN FP: digging in the sand
  hu FP: ásás a homokban
4614 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: lógni | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc lógni is intransitive (to hang down); used felakaszt for hanging something up
  EN TS: He is hanging a paper garland.
  hu TS: Papírfüzért akaszt fel.
  EN FS: He is hanging a paper lantern.
  hu FS: Papírlampiont akaszt fel.
  EN TP: hanging party decorations
  hu TP: partidíszek felakasztása
  EN FP: hanging the washing
  hu FP: a mosott ruha kiteregetése
4615 | colorful (adjective): having striking, bright color | loc: színes
  EN TS: This room is super colorful.
  hu TS: Ez a szoba szuper színes.
  EN FS: This room is super grey.
  hu FS: Ez a szoba szuper szürke.
  EN TP: colorful party balloons
  hu TP: színes partilufik
  EN FP: colorful Easter eggs
  hu FP: színes húsvéti tojások
4616 | wood (noun): a large area densely covered with trees | loc: erdő
  EN TS: A wild stag in a misty wood.
  hu TS: Vad szarvas a ködös erdőben.
  EN FS: A wild boar in a misty wood.
  hu FS: Vaddisznó a ködös erdőben.
  EN TP: a stag in the wood
  hu TP: szarvas az erdőben
  EN FP: a table made of wood
  hu FP: fából készült asztal
4617 | fight (verb): to be engaged in a fight | loc: harcolni
  EN TS: Men in armour are fighting.
  hu TS: Páncélos férfiak harcolnak.
  EN FS: Men in suits are fighting.
  hu FS: Öltönyös férfiak harcolnak.
  EN TP: fighting with shields
  hu TP: harc pajzsokkal
  EN FP: fighting over a parking space
  hu FP: harc egy parkolóhelyért
4618 | charge (noun): a sudden rush toward someone or something | loc: roham
  EN TS: Here comes the charge!
  hu TS: Itt jön a roham!
  EN FS: Here comes the rain!
  hu FS: Itt jön az eső!
  EN TP: a charge with shields
  hu TP: roham pajzsokkal
  EN FP: a charge for extra bags
  hu FP: pótdíj extra csomagért
4619 | raw (adjective): not processed or cooked, in a simple natural state | loc: nyers
  EN TS: Raw chicken, raw fish, no dinner yet.
  hu TS: Nyers csirke, nyers hal, vacsora még sehol.
  EN FS: Raw chicken, raw beef, no dinner yet.
  hu FS: Nyers csirke, nyers marha, vacsora még sehol.
  EN TP: a raw frozen chicken
  hu TP: nyers fagyasztott csirke
  EN FP: a raw egg
  hu FP: egy nyers tojás
4620 | overnight (adverb): during or for one night | loc: éjszakán át
  EN TS: He is sleeping here overnight.
  hu TS: Éjszakán át itt alszik.
  EN FS: He is working here overnight.
  hu FS: Éjszakán át itt dolgozik.
  EN TP: stuck overnight at an airport
  hu TP: éjszakán át a reptéren ragadva
  EN FP: an overnight train journey
  hu FP: éjszakai vonatút
4621 | passenger (noun): a traveler riding in a vehicle, not driving it | loc: utas
  EN TS: The passengers look like the flight is never coming.
  hu TS: Az utasok úgy néznek, mint akik szerint a gép sosem jön meg.
  EN FS: The pilots look like the flight is never coming.
  hu FS: A pilóták úgy néznek, mint akik szerint a gép sosem jön meg.
  EN TP: tired passengers waiting
  hu TP: fáradt utasok várakoznak
  EN FP: passengers on a plane
  hu FP: utasok a repülőn
4622 | sigh (verb): to breathe out deeply and heavily | loc: sóhajtani
  EN TS: She is sighing at the ceiling.
  hu TS: A plafonra nézve sóhajt.
  EN FS: She is sighing at the window.
  hu FS: Az ablakra nézve sóhajt.
  EN TP: sighing at the gate
  hu TP: sóhajtás a kapunál
  EN FP: sighing with relief
  hu FP: megkönnyebbült sóhaj
4623 | vote (noun): a choice made by counting people in favor | loc: szavazat
  EN TS: The votes are falling out.
  hu TS: Kihullanak a szavazatok.
  EN FS: The coins are falling out.
  hu FS: Kihullanak az érmék.
  EN TP: counting the votes
  hu TP: a szavazatok számlálása
  EN FP: casting a vote
  hu FP: szavazat leadása
4624 | majority (noun): more than half of the votes | loc: többség
  EN TS: A clear majority!
  hu TS: Egyértelmű többség!
  EN FS: A clear minority!
  hu FS: Egyértelmű kisebbség!
  EN TP: a clear majority
  hu TP: egyértelmű többség
  EN FP: a majority of empty chairs
  hu FP: üres székek többsége
4625 | vote (verb): to express your choice for a candidate | loc: szavazni
  EN TS: She is voting like a champion!
  hu TS: A nő úgy szavaz, mint egy bajnok!
  EN FS: He is voting like a champion!
  hu FS: A férfi úgy szavaz, mint egy bajnok!
  EN TP: voting with joy
  hu TP: boldogan szavazni
  EN FP: voting by post
  hu FP: levélben szavazni
4627 | leave (verb): to go away from a place | loc: elmenni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone leaves. He waves!
  hu TS: Mindenki elmegy. Ő integet!
  EN FS: Everyone stays. He waves!
  hu FS: Mindenki marad. Ő integet!
  EN TP: waving as the ship leaves
  hu TP: integet az elmenő hajónak
  EN FP: leaving on a bike
  hu FP: biciklivel elmenni
4628 | sad (adjective): feeling or showing unhappiness | loc: szomorú
  EN TS: Picnic cancelled. He is sad.
  hu TS: Elmaradt a piknik. A srác szomorú.
  EN FS: Picnic cancelled. She is sad.
  hu FS: Elmaradt a piknik. A lány szomorú.
  EN TP: sad about the rain
  hu TP: szomorú az eső miatt
  EN FP: sad about the snow
  hu FP: szomorú a hó miatt
4629 | endless (adjective): seeming to have no end, tiresomely long | loc: végtelen
  EN TS: Endless sand, one tiny walker.
  hu TS: Végtelen homok, egy apró vándor.
  EN FS: Endless sand, one tiny camel.
  hu FS: Végtelen homok, egy apró teve.
  EN TP: endless rows of dunes
  hu TP: végtelen dűnesorok
  EN FP: an endless queue of cars
  hu FP: végtelen autósor
4630 | haircut (noun): the shape and style your hair is cut in | loc: hajvágás
  EN TS: He drew the haircut first.
  hu TS: Először a hajvágást rajzolta meg.
  EN FS: He drew the beard first.
  hu FS: Először a szakállt rajzolta meg.
  EN TP: a sharp fade haircut
  hu TP: éles átmenetes hajvágás
  EN FP: a haircut with long sides
  hu FP: hajvágás hosszú oldalakkal
4631 | design (verb): to make or work out a plan for something | loc: megtervezni
  EN TS: He designed a birdhouse.
  hu TS: Megtervezett egy madárodút.
  EN FS: He designed a dog house.
  hu FS: Megtervezett egy kutyaházat.
  EN TP: designing a birdhouse
  hu TP: madárodút tervez
  EN FP: designing a website
  hu FP: weboldalt tervez
4632 | workspace (noun): the desk area where you set up to work | loc: munkasarok
  EN TS: The workspace is now complete.
  hu TS: Kész a munkasarok.
  EN FS: The kitchen is now complete.
  hu FS: Kész a konyha.
  EN TP: setting up a workspace
  hu TP: munkasarok berendezése
  EN FP: sharing a workspace
  hu FP: közös munkasarok
4633 | desperate (adjective): marked by despair or loss of hope | loc: kétségbeesett
  EN TS: The old car made him desperate.
  hu TS: A régi autótól teljesen kétségbeesett.
  EN FS: The old van made him desperate.
  hu FS: A régi furgontól teljesen kétségbeesett.
  EN TP: desperate in the rain
  hu TP: kétségbeesett az esőben
  EN FP: desperate for a coffee
  hu FP: kétségbeesetten egy kávéért
4634 | reach (verb): to arrive at a destination | loc: elérni
  EN TS: She reached the town at last!
  hu TS: Végre elérte a várost!
  EN FS: She reached the lake at last!
  hu FS: Végre elérte a tavat!
  EN TP: reaching the seaside town
  hu TP: a tengerparti város elérése
  EN FP: reaching for the phone
  hu FP: a telefonért nyúl
4635 | destination (noun): the place you are travelling to | loc: úti cél
  EN TS: She reached her destination.
  hu TS: Elérte az úti célját.
  EN FS: She reached her hotel.
  hu FS: Elérte a szállodáját.
  EN TP: reaching her destination
  hu TP: eléri az úti célját
  EN FP: a destination by plane
  hu FP: repülős úti cél
4636 | lighthouse (noun): a tall sea tower whose light guides ships | loc: világítótorony
  EN TS: She found the real lighthouse!
  hu TS: Megtalálta az igazi világítótornyot!
  EN FS: She found the real castle!
  hu FS: Megtalálta az igazi kastélyt!
  EN TP: a red-and-white lighthouse
  hu TP: piros-fehér világítótorony
  EN FP: a lighthouse in a storm
  hu FP: világítótorony viharban
4637 | destroy (verb): to cause the destruction of something | loc: lerombol
  EN TS: They are destroying the house, and she films it.
  hu TS: Lerombolják a házat, ő meg filmezi.
  EN FS: They are destroying the car, and she films it.
  hu FS: Lerombolják az autót, ő meg filmezi.
  EN TP: destroying an old house
  hu TP: régi ház lerombolása
  EN FP: destroying an old car
  hu FP: régi autó szétverése
4638 | rubble (noun): broken stones left when a building falls | loc: törmelék
  EN TS: Bye, house. Now it is rubble.
  hu TS: Viszlát, ház. Most már csak törmelék.
  EN FS: Bye, barn. Now it is rubble.
  hu FS: Viszlát, pajta. Most már csak törmelék.
  EN TP: a heap of rubble
  hu TP: egy halom törmelék
  EN FP: clearing away the rubble
  hu FP: a törmelék eltakarítása
4639 | liquid (adjective): having the characteristics of a liquid, flowing | loc: folyékony
  EN TS: The liquid soap is blue-green.
  hu TS: A folyékony szappan kékeszöld.
  EN FS: The liquid soap is bright red.
  hu FS: A folyékony szappan élénkpiros.
  EN TP: liquid soap pouring out
  hu TP: csorgó folyékony szappan
  EN FP: liquid paint on a brush
  hu FP: folyékony festék az ecseten
4640 | detergent (noun): a liquid or powder used for washing up | loc: tisztítószer
  EN TS: Blue detergent, white shirt!
  hu TS: Kék tisztítószer, fehér ing!
  EN FS: Pink detergent, white shirt!
  hu FS: Rózsaszín tisztítószer, fehér ing!
  EN TP: pouring laundry detergent
  hu TP: tisztítószer öntése
  EN FP: detergent for the dishes
  hu FP: tisztítószer a mosogatáshoz
4641 | diet (noun): a chosen selection of foods to eat | loc: étrend
  EN TS: Goodbye, doughnuts. Hello, diet.
  hu TS: Viszlát, fánkok. Helló, új étrend.
  EN FS: Goodbye, salad. Hello, doughnuts.
  hu FS: Viszlát, saláta. Helló, fánkok.
  EN TP: meal prep for a diet
  hu TP: előre főzött kaja az étrendhez
  EN FP: a diet of doughnuts
  hu FP: fánkokból álló étrend
4642 | pit (noun): a sizeable hole in the ground | loc: gödör
  EN TS: Best pit ever. The dog helped.
  hu TS: Legjobb gödör ever. A kutya segített.
  EN FS: Best pit ever. The cat helped.
  hu FS: Legjobb gödör ever. A macska segített.
  EN TP: a deep sand pit
  hu TP: mély homokgödör
  EN FP: a pit full of snakes
  hu FP: kígyókkal teli gödör
4643 | production (noun): a show made for stage, screen or radio | loc: produkció
  EN TS: The production is going well!
  hu TS: Jól halad a produkció!
  EN FS: The production is going badly!
  hu FS: Rosszul halad a produkció!
  EN TP: a film production at home
  hu TP: otthoni filmprodukció
  EN FP: a factory production line
  hu FP: gyári termelősor
4644 | excuse (noun): a defense of some bad behavior or failure | loc: kifogás
  EN TS: Work? What a bad excuse.
  hu TS: Munka? Micsoda gyenge kifogás.
  EN FS: Rain? What a bad excuse.
  hu FS: Eső? Micsoda gyenge kifogás.
  EN TP: a bad excuse for leaving
  hu TP: gyenge kifogás a lelépésre
  EN FP: an excuse for being late
  hu FP: kifogás a késésre
4645 | attach (verb): to fasten something so it is attached | loc: rögzíteni
  EN TS: Hands are attaching balls.
  hu TS: Kezek golyókat rögzítenek.
  EN FS: Hands are attaching wheels.
  hu FS: Kezek kerekeket rögzítenek.
  EN TP: attaching balls to rods
  hu TP: golyók rögzítése rudakra
  EN FP: attaching rods to the wall
  hu FP: rudak rögzítése a falra
4646 | divorce (noun): the legal ending of a marriage | loc: válás
  EN TS: Rings off: this is a divorce.
  hu TS: Lekerültek a gyűrűk: ez válás.
  EN FS: Rings off: this is a wedding.
  hu FS: Lekerültek a gyűrűk: ez esküvő.
  EN TP: rings left after a divorce
  hu TP: gyűrűk a válás után
  EN FP: a divorce lawyer's office
  hu FP: válóperes ügyvéd irodája
4647 | to spin (verb): to turn round and round quickly | loc: pörögni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He spun too much. Floor time.
  hu TS: Túl sokat pörgött. Irány a padló.
  EN FS: He ran too much. Floor time.
  hu FS: Túl sokat futott. Irány a padló.
  EN TP: spinning on an office chair
  hu TP: pörgés irodai széken
  EN FP: spinning on a dance floor
  hu FP: pörgés a táncparketten
4648 | examine (verb): to check someone's body for signs of illness | loc: megvizsgálni
  EN TS: She is examining a small boy.
  hu TS: Megvizsgál egy kisfiút.
  EN FS: She is examining a small dog.
  hu FS: Megvizsgál egy kiskutyát.
  EN TP: examining a worried boy
  hu TP: egy aggódó kisfiú megvizsgálása
  EN FP: examining a worried cat
  hu FP: egy aggódó macska megvizsgálása
4649 | teddy (noun): a child's toy bear, plush and stuffed | loc: plüssmackó
  EN TS: The teddy is braver than him.
  hu TS: A plüssmackó bátrabb nála.
  EN FS: The puppy is braver than him.
  hu FS: A kiskutya bátrabb nála.
  EN TP: hugging a brown teddy
  hu TP: barna plüssmackót ölel
  EN FP: hugging a brown puppy
  hu FP: barna kiskutyát ölel
4650 | reaction (noun): a process in which substances change into others | loc: reakció
  EN TS: The reaction is making foam!
  hu TS: A reakció habot termel!
  EN FS: The reaction is making smoke!
  hu FS: A reakció füstöt termel!
  EN TP: a foaming chemical reaction
  hu TP: habzó kémiai reakció
  EN FP: a quick allergic reaction
  hu FP: gyors allergiás reakció
4651 | marine (adjective): relating to the sea | loc: tengeri
  EN TS: Marine life at sunset.
  hu TS: Tengeri élet naplementekor.
  EN FS: Marine life at noon.
  hu FS: Tengeri élet délben.
  EN TP: marine animals jumping
  hu TP: ugráló tengeri állatok
  EN FP: a marine in uniform
  hu FP: egyenruhás tengerészgyalogos
4652 | compete (verb): to take part in a contest against others | loc: versenyezni
  EN TS: She is competing with a man.
  hu TS: Egy férfival versenyez.
  EN FS: She is competing with a child.
  hu FS: Egy gyerekkel versenyez.
  EN TP: competing at arm-wrestling
  hu TP: szkanderben versenyezni
  EN FP: competing in a cooking show
  hu FP: főzőshow-ban versenyezni
4653 | mud (noun): soft wet earth, soil soaked with water | loc: sár | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He left the mud on the mat. Mostly.
  hu TS: A sarat a lábtörlőn hagyta. Nagyjából.
  EN FS: He left the snow on the mat. Mostly.
  hu FS: A havat a lábtörlőn hagyta. Nagyjából.
  EN TP: boots covered in mud
  hu TP: sárral borított csizma
  EN FP: mud on the kitchen table
  hu FP: sár a konyhaasztalon
4654 | doubt (noun): the state of being unsure | loc: kétség
  EN TS: She has doubts about it.
  hu TS: Kétségei vannak ezzel kapcsolatban.
  EN FS: She has no doubts about it.
  hu FS: Semmi kétsége ezzel kapcsolatban.
  EN TP: doubts about a shelf
  hu TP: kétségek egy polc miatt
  EN FP: doubts about the paint
  hu FP: kétségek a festék miatt
4655 | dress (verb): to put on clothes | loc: felöltözik | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is dressing in a suit.
  hu TS: Öltönybe öltözik fel.
  EN FS: He is dressing in a hoodie.
  hu FS: Kapucnis pulcsiba öltözik fel.
  EN TP: dressing in a suit
  hu TP: felöltözik öltönybe
  EN FP: dressing a salad
  hu FP: salátát öntetez
4656 | mount (verb): to attach something to a support | loc: felszerel
  EN TS: She mounted two shelves.
  hu TS: Felszerelt két polcot.
  EN FS: She mounted two mirrors.
  hu FS: Felszerelt két tükröt.
  EN TP: mounting shelves on a wall
  hu TP: polcok felszerelése a falra
  EN FP: mounting a horse
  hu FP: felülni a lóra
4657 | to drink (verb): to take in liquids | loc: inni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is drinking coconut water.
  hu TS: Kókuszvizet iszik.
  EN FS: She is drinking orange juice.
  hu FS: Narancslevet iszik.
  EN TP: to drink through a straw
  hu TP: szívószállal inni
  EN FP: to drink from a tap
  hu FP: csapból inni
4658 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: vezetni
  EN TS: She is driving by the sea.
  hu TS: A tenger mellett vezet.
  EN FS: She is driving by a lake.
  hu FS: Egy tó mellett vezet.
  EN TP: to drive along the coast
  hu TP: vezetni a part mentén
  EN FP: to drive along a river
  hu FP: vezetni egy folyó mentén
4659 | car (noun): a motor vehicle with four wheels | loc: autó
  EN TS: All these people are in cars.
  hu TS: Ezek az emberek mind autóban ülnek.
  EN FS: All these people are on bikes.
  hu FS: Ezek az emberek mind biciklin ülnek.
  EN TP: people in their cars
  hu TP: emberek az autójukban
  EN FP: people in their beds
  hu FP: emberek az ágyukban
4660 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: halom
  EN TS: Her shopping is one big pile.
  hu TS: A bevásárlása egyetlen nagy halom.
  EN FS: Her shopping is in one bag.
  hu FS: A bevásárlása egyetlen szatyorban van.
  EN TP: a pile of boxes
  hu TP: egy halom doboz
  EN FP: a pile of laundry
  hu FP: egy halom szennyes
4661 | fall (noun): the season when leaves fall from the trees | loc: ősz
  EN TS: Fall is here in the park!
  hu TS: Megjött az ősz a parkba!
  EN FS: Spring is here in the park!
  hu FS: Megjött a tavasz a parkba!
  EN TP: yellow leaves in the fall
  hu TP: sárga levelek ősszel
  EN FP: fall fashion in a shop
  hu FP: őszi divat egy boltban
4662 | supply (verb): to give something useful or necessary | loc: ellátni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A plane is supplying the village.
  hu TS: Egy repülő látja el a falut.
  EN FS: A truck is supplying the village.
  hu FS: Egy teherautó látja el a falut.
  EN TP: supplying a village by air
  hu TP: falu ellátása légi úton
  EN FP: supplying a village by boat
  hu FP: falu ellátása hajóval
4663 | drop (noun): a small round shape, like a bead of liquid | loc: csepp
  EN TS: A drop is about to land.
  hu TS: Egy csepp mindjárt landol.
  EN FS: A bee is about to land.
  hu FS: Egy méh mindjárt landol.
  EN TP: a single clear drop
  hu TP: egyetlen tiszta csepp
  EN FP: a drop of rain
  hu FP: egy esőcsepp
4664 | dose (noun): a measured portion of medicine taken at one time | loc: adag
  EN TS: She is counting the dose drop by drop.
  hu TS: Cseppenként méri ki az adagot.
  EN FS: She is counting the dose spoon by spoon.
  hu FS: Kanalanként méri ki az adagot.
  EN TP: a dose of yellow oil
  hu TP: egy adag sárga olaj
  EN FP: a dose of cough syrup
  hu FP: egy adag köhögés elleni szirup
4665 | accident (noun): an unfortunate mishap causing damage or injury | loc: baleset
  EN TS: One accident after another!
  hu TS: Egyik baleset a másik után!
  EN FS: One goal after another!
  hu FS: Egyik gól a másik után!
  EN TP: a run of small accidents
  hu TP: kisebb balesetek sorozata
  EN FP: a car accident
  hu FP: autóbaleset
4666 | smash (verb): to hit something hard | loc: szétzúzni
  EN TS: The pumpkin smashed. Oops!
  hu TS: A tök szétzúzódott. Hoppá!
  EN FS: The egg smashed. Oops!
  hu FS: A tojás szétzúzódott. Hoppá!
  EN TP: a pumpkin smashing on concrete
  hu TP: betonon szétzúzódó tök
  EN FP: a pumpkin smashing a window
  hu FP: ablakot betörő tök
4667 | plane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings and engines | loc: repülőgép
  EN TS: The plane is dropping boxes. Air delivery!
  hu TS: A repülőgép dobozokat dob le. Légi szállítás!
  EN FS: The plane is dropping letters. Air delivery!
  hu FS: A repülőgép leveleket dob le. Légi szállítás!
  EN TP: a plane dropping crates
  hu TP: ládákat ledobó repülőgép
  EN FP: a plane landing on grass
  hu FP: füvön leszálló repülőgép
4668 | to smell (verb): to inhale the odor of something | loc: szagolni
  EN TS: She is smelling the washing.
  hu TS: Megszagolja a mosott ruhát.
  EN FS: She is ironing the washing.
  hu FS: Kivasalja a mosott ruhát.
  EN TP: smelling clean washing
  hu TP: tiszta ruha szagolgatása
  EN FP: smelling the sea air
  hu FP: a tengeri levegő szagolása
4669 | laundry (noun): garments that can be cleaned by washing | loc: mosnivaló | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc mosnivaló means dirty laundry to be washed; clean drying laundry = mosott ruha
  EN TS: Laundry with a sea view!
  hu TS: Mosott ruha tengerre néző kilátással!
  EN FS: Laundry with a city view!
  hu FS: Mosott ruha városra néző kilátással!
  EN TP: white laundry on a line
  hu TP: fehér ruhák a szárítókötélen
  EN FP: a bag of dirty laundry
  hu FP: egy zsák mosnivaló
4670 | roof (noun): the protective covering on top of a building | loc: tető
  EN TS: She is on the roof.
  hu TS: A tetőn van.
  EN FS: She is in the garden.
  hu FS: A kertben van.
  EN TP: washing on a flat roof
  hu TP: ruhaszárítás lapos tetőn
  EN FP: a cat on a roof
  hu FP: macska a tetőn
4671 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: gép
  EN TS: The blanket is in the machine.
  hu TS: A takaró a gépben van.
  EN FS: The towel is in the machine.
  hu FS: A törölköző a gépben van.
  EN TP: a washing machine
  hu TP: mosógép
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  hu FP: kávégép
4672 | reed (noun): tall grasses with hollow slender stems | loc: nád
  EN TS: Reeds grow at both edges.
  hu TS: Mindkét parton nád nő.
  EN FS: Trees grow at both edges.
  hu FS: Mindkét parton fák nőnek.
  EN TP: tall reeds by the water
  hu TP: magas nád a víz mellett
  EN FP: a woven reed basket
  hu FP: fonott nádkosár
4673 | weak (adjective): lacking physical strength | loc: gyenge
  EN TS: He is way too weak for it!
  hu TS: Ehhez ő túl gyenge, tesó!
  EN FS: He is way too strong for it!
  hu FS: Ehhez ő túl erős, tesó!
  EN TP: a weak skinny arm
  hu TP: gyenge, vékony kar
  EN FP: a weak cup of tea
  hu FP: gyenge tea
4674 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: polc
  EN TS: He is dusting the shelves.
  hu TS: Leporolja a polcokat.
  EN FS: He is painting the shelves.
  hu FS: Lefesti a polcokat.
  EN TP: dusting the shelves
  hu TP: polcok leporolása
  EN FP: building the shelves
  hu FP: polcok összeszerelése
4675 | careful (adjective): showing caution, care or attention | loc: óvatos
  EN TS: He is not careful at all!
  hu TS: A srác egyáltalán nem óvatos!
  EN FS: She is not careful at all!
  hu FS: A lány egyáltalán nem óvatos!
  EN TP: not careful on a bridge
  hu TP: nem óvatos a hídon
  EN FP: careful with the tulips
  hu FP: óvatos a tulipánokkal
4676 | tradition (noun): a pattern of action passed down over time | loc: hagyomány
  EN TS: Carrying cheese is a tradition here.
  hu TS: Itt hagyomány a sajt cipelése.
  EN FS: Carrying fish is a tradition here.
  hu FS: Itt hagyomány a hal cipelése.
  EN TP: an old cheese tradition
  hu TP: régi sajtos hagyomány
  EN FP: an old dance tradition
  hu FP: régi tánchagyomány
4678 | eat (verb): to take in solid food | loc: enni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone is eating something.
  hu TS: Mindenki eszik valamit.
  EN FS: Everyone is drinking tea.
  hu FS: Mindenki teát iszik.
  EN TP: eating a triple burger
  hu TP: tripla burgert eszik
  EN FP: eating a salad bowl
  hu FP: salátástálat eszik
4679 | delicious (adjective): greatly pleasing to taste | loc: finom
  EN TS: These tacos are delicious!
  hu TS: Ezek a tacók nagyon finomak!
  EN FS: These burgers are delicious!
  hu FS: Ezek a burgerek nagyon finomak!
  EN TP: two delicious tacos
  hu TP: két finom taco
  EN FP: a delicious cold soup
  hu FP: egy finom hideg leves
4680 | rider (noun): a traveler who rides an animal like a horse | loc: lovas
  EN TS: A rider is mounting a camel.
  hu TS: Egy lovas felszáll egy tevére.
  EN FS: A rider is mounting a horse.
  hu FS: Egy lovas felszáll egy lóra.
  EN TP: a rider mounting a camel
  hu TP: tevére szálló lovas
  EN FP: a rider on a horse
  hu FP: lovas lóháton
4681 | lamp (noun): an artificial source of light | loc: lámpa
  EN TS: So many glass lamps!
  hu TS: Mennyi üveglámpa!
  EN FS: So many glass bottles!
  hu FS: Mennyi üvegpalack!
  EN TP: a blue glass lamp
  hu TP: kék üveglámpa
  EN FP: a blue glass vase
  hu FP: kék üvegváza
4682 | trader (noun): someone who buys goods to sell them | loc: kereskedő
  EN TS: The trader is pouring spice.
  hu TS: A kereskedő fűszert tölt.
  EN FS: The trader is pouring tea.
  hu FS: A kereskedő teát tölt.
  EN TP: a spice trader
  hu TP: fűszerkereskedő
  EN FP: a stock market trader
  hu FP: tőzsdei kereskedő
4683 | rice (noun): grains used as food | loc: rizs
  EN TS: Rice is all over the counter.
  hu TS: Tele van a pult rizzsel.
  EN FS: Salt is all over the counter.
  hu FS: Tele van a pult sóval.
  EN TP: a bowl of cooked rice
  hu TP: egy tál főtt rizs
  EN FP: a bag of raw rice
  hu FP: egy zacskó nyers rizs
4684 | elbow (noun): the joint between the forearm and upper arm | loc: könyök
  EN TS: Elbow bump: new handshake.
  hu TS: Könyökpacsi: az új kézfogás.
  EN FS: Fist bump: new handshake.
  hu FS: Ökölpacsi: az új kézfogás.
  EN TP: bumping elbows at work
  hu TP: könyökpacsi a munkahelyen
  EN FP: elbows on the desk
  hu FP: könyök az asztalon
4685 | repair (verb): to fix something by replacing a broken part | loc: megjavítani
  EN TS: He is repairing the fuse box.
  hu TS: Megjavítja a biztosítékdobozt.
  EN FS: He is repairing the car.
  hu FS: Megjavítja az autót.
  EN TP: repairing the fuse box
  hu TP: a biztosítékdoboz megjavítása
  EN FP: repairing a flat tyre
  hu FP: defektes gumi megjavítása
4686 | repair (noun): the act of making something work again | loc: javítás
  EN TS: Repair done, lights on!
  hu TS: Javítás kész, van fény!
  EN FS: Repair done, water on!
  hu FS: Javítás kész, van víz!
  EN TP: a repair in the dark
  hu TP: javítás a sötétben
  EN FP: a car repair shop
  hu FP: autójavító műhely
4687 | embassy (noun): a building where ambassadors live or work | loc: nagykövetség
  EN TS: She is at the embassy.
  hu TS: A nagykövetségnél van.
  EN FS: She is inside the embassy.
  hu FS: A nagykövetség épületében van.
  EN TP: papers for the embassy
  hu TP: iratok a nagykövetségre
  EN FP: an embassy party at night
  hu FP: éjszakai nagykövetségi buli
4688 | massive (adjective): imposing in size or bulk | loc: hatalmas
  EN TS: Just a massive whale, no big deal.
  hu TS: Csak egy hatalmas bálna, semmi különös.
  EN FS: Just a massive shark, no big deal.
  hu FS: Csak egy hatalmas cápa, semmi különös.
  EN TP: a massive humpback whale
  hu TP: hatalmas púpos bálna
  EN FP: a massive storm at sea
  hu FP: hatalmas vihar a tengeren
4689 | boat (noun): a small vessel for travel on water | loc: csónak
  EN TS: A whale next to the boat!
  hu TS: Egy bálna a csónak mellett!
  EN FS: A shark next to the boat!
  hu FS: Egy cápa a csónak mellett!
  EN TP: a whale by the boat
  hu TP: bálna a csónak mellett
  EN FP: a dolphin by the boat
  hu FP: delfin a csónak mellett
4690 | workplace (noun): a place where work is done | loc: munkahely
  EN TS: His workplace is a cubicle.
  hu TS: A munkahelye egy irodafülke.
  EN FS: His workplace is a kitchen.
  hu FS: A munkahelye egy konyha.
  EN TP: a busy open workplace
  hu TP: nyüzsgő egyterű munkahely
  EN FP: a workplace on a farm
  hu FP: munkahely egy farmon
4691 | colleague (noun): a person you work with at your job | loc: kolléga
  EN TS: He is greeting a colleague.
  hu TS: Üdvözöl egy kollégát.
  EN FS: He is greeting a dog.
  hu FS: Üdvözöl egy kutyát.
  EN TP: greeting a colleague
  hu TP: kolléga üdvözlése
  EN FP: a colleague on holiday
  hu FP: kolléga szabadságon
4692 | product (noun): goods offered for sale | loc: termék
  EN TS: He is shelving the products.
  hu TS: Polcra pakolja a termékeket.
  EN FS: He is shelving the books.
  hu FS: Polcra pakolja a könyveket.
  EN TP: products on a shelf
  hu TP: termékek a polcon
  EN FP: products in a truck
  hu FP: termékek egy teherautóban
4693 | hire (verb): to engage someone for work | loc: felvesz
  EN TS: The boss just hired him.
  hu TS: A főnök épp felvette.
  EN FS: The boss just fired him.
  hu FS: A főnök épp kirúgta.
  EN TP: hiring a new worker
  hu TP: új dolgozó felvétele
  EN FP: hiring a holiday car
  hu FP: autóbérlés a nyaralásra
4694 | contract (noun): a binding agreement enforceable by law | loc: szerződés
  EN TS: He signed the contract!
  hu TS: Aláírta a szerződést!
  EN FS: He tore up the contract!
  hu FS: Széttépte a szerződést!
  EN TP: signing a contract
  hu TP: szerződés aláírása
  EN FP: reading a contract at home
  hu FP: szerződés olvasása otthon
4695 | chaos (noun): a state of extreme confusion and disorder | loc: káosz
  EN TS: He made all this chaos.
  hu TS: Ezt az egész káoszt ő csinálta.
  EN FS: He cleaned up all this chaos.
  hu FS: Ezt az egész káoszt ő takarította el.
  EN TP: chaos on the floor
  hu TP: káosz a padlón
  EN FP: chaos in the kitchen
  hu FP: káosz a konyhában
4696 | encourage (verb): to inspire someone with confidence | loc: bátorítani
  EN TS: They are encouraging her!
  hu TS: Bátorítják őt!
  EN FS: They are laughing at her!
  hu FS: Kinevetik őt!
  EN TP: encouraging a climber
  hu TP: egy mászó bátorítása
  EN FP: encouraging a child to read
  hu FP: gyerek bátorítása olvasásra
4697 | start (noun): the beginning of anything | loc: kezdet | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc kezdet is unnatural for a sprint start; used rajt
  EN TS: He has a lightning start!
  hu TS: Villámgyors a rajtja!
  EN FS: He has a slow start!
  hu FS: Lassú a rajtja!
  EN TP: a start from the blocks
  hu TP: rajt a startgépből
  EN FP: the start of school
  hu FP: az iskolakezdés
4698 | motor (noun): a machine that turns energy into motion | loc: motor
  EN TS: What a huge motor!
  hu TS: Micsoda hatalmas motor!
  EN FS: What a huge tyre!
  hu FS: Micsoda hatalmas gumi!
  EN TP: a huge V8 motor
  hu TP: hatalmas V8-as motor
  EN FP: a huge boat motor
  hu FP: hatalmas csónakmotor
4699 | machinery (noun): machines as a group | loc: gépezet
  EN TS: He's inspecting the machinery.
  hu TS: Átvizsgálja a gépezetet.
  EN FS: He is repairing the machinery.
  hu FS: Megjavítja a gépezetet.
  EN TP: old factory machinery
  hu TP: régi gyári gépezet
  EN FP: old farm machinery
  hu FP: régi mezőgazdasági gépezet
4700 | robot (noun): a mechanism that can move automatically | loc: robot
  EN TS: The robot handed him a mug.
  hu TS: A robot egy bögrét nyújtott neki.
  EN FS: The robot handed him a phone.
  hu FS: A robot egy telefont nyújtott neki.
  EN TP: a robot holding a mug
  hu TP: bögrét tartó robot
  EN FP: a robot vacuum cleaner
  hu FP: robotporszívó
4701 | ruin (verb): to destroy completely | loc: lerombolni
  EN TS: The sea ruined it. Thanks, sea.
  hu TS: A tenger lerombolta. Kösz, tenger.
  EN FS: The dog ruined it. Thanks, dog.
  hu FS: A kutya lerombolta. Kösz, kutya.
  EN TP: a ruined sandcastle
  hu TP: lerombolt homokvár
  EN FP: a ruined old church
  hu FP: lerombolt régi templom
4702 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: megszökni
  EN TS: The goat escaped. Bye, farmer!
  hu TS: A kecske megszökött. Csá, gazda!
  EN FS: The cow escaped. Bye, farmer!
  hu FS: A tehén megszökött. Csá, gazda!
  EN TP: escaping from a goat pen
  hu TP: megszökni a kecskekarámból
  EN FP: escaping from a fox
  hu FP: megszökni egy róka elől
4703 | raise (verb): to move something from lower to higher | loc: felemel
  EN TS: He is raising a green flag.
  hu TS: Felemel egy zöld zászlót.
  EN FS: He is raising a red flag.
  hu FS: Felemel egy piros zászlót.
  EN TP: raising a flag
  hu TP: zászló felemelése
  EN FP: raising a child
  hu FP: gyereknevelés
4704 | hat (noun): headwear that protects the head from bad weather | loc: kalap
  EN TS: He wears a fur hat in a sauna!
  hu TS: Szőrmekalapot visel a szaunában!
  EN FS: He wears a cap in a sauna!
  hu FS: Baseballsapkát visel a szaunában!
  EN TP: wearing a fur hat
  hu TP: szőrmekalapot visel
  EN FP: wearing a straw hat
  hu FP: szalmakalapot visel
4705 | band (noun): a group of people who play music together | loc: zenekar
  EN TS: The whole town loves the band!
  hu TS: Az egész város imádja a zenekart!
  EN FS: The whole town hates the band!
  hu FS: Az egész város utálja a zenekart!
  EN TP: a street band playing
  hu TP: játszó utcai zenekar
  EN FP: a band in a stadium
  hu FP: zenekar egy stadionban
4706 | to shout (verb): to speak in a loud voice | loc: kiabálni
  EN TS: The whole stadium is shouting.
  hu TS: Az egész stadion kiabál.
  EN FS: The whole stadium is sitting.
  hu FS: Az egész stadion ül.
  EN TP: fans shouting in a stadium
  hu TP: kiabáló szurkolók a stadionban
  EN FP: shouting in a library
  hu FP: kiabálás a könyvtárban
4707 | patient (noun): a person who needs medical care | loc: beteg
  EN TS: Best patient ever. He smiles.
  hu TS: A legjobb beteg ever. Mosolyog.
  EN FS: Best patient ever. He sleeps.
  hu FS: A legjobb beteg ever. Alszik.
  EN TP: a patient with a nurse
  hu TP: beteg egy ápolóval
  EN FP: a patient in an ambulance
  hu FP: beteg a mentőautóban
4708 | guide (verb): to direct the course of someone's travel | loc: vezet
  EN TS: A man is guiding the group.
  hu TS: Egy férfi vezeti a csoportot.
  EN FS: A dog is guiding the group.
  hu FS: Egy kutya vezeti a csoportot.
  EN TP: guiding a tour group
  hu TP: turistacsoport vezetése
  EN FP: guiding a ship into port
  hu FP: hajó bevezetése a kikötőbe
4709 | group (noun): a number of people or things taken as a unit | loc: csoport
  EN TS: The whole group is cheering!
  hu TS: Az egész csoport ujjong!
  EN FS: The whole group is crying!
  hu FS: Az egész csoport sír!
  EN TP: a group in matching hats
  hu TP: csoport egyforma sapkában
  EN FP: a group in matching shirts
  hu FP: csoport egyforma pólóban
4710 | arm (noun): the human limb between the shoulder and the hand | loc: kar
  EN TS: They are swinging their arms.
  hu TS: Lóbálják a karjukat.
  EN FS: They are swinging their legs.
  hu FS: Lóbálják a lábukat.
  EN TP: arms up over the head
  hu TP: karok a fej fölött
  EN FP: arms crossed over the chest
  hu FP: keresztbe font karok
4711 | effort (noun): the hard work you put into something | loc: erőfeszítés
  EN TS: His face is pure effort.
  hu TS: Az arca maga a tiszta erőfeszítés.
  EN FS: His face is pure boredom.
  hu FS: Az arca maga a tiszta unalom.
  EN TP: rowing with full effort
  hu TP: evezés teljes erőfeszítéssel
  EN FP: running with full effort
  hu FP: futás teljes erőfeszítéssel
4712 | blow (verb): to push air out of your mouth to move something | loc: fújni
  EN TS: He is blowing out all the candles!
  hu TS: Elfújja az összes gyertyát!
  EN FS: He is blowing up all the balloons!
  hu FS: Felfújja az összes lufit!
  EN TP: blowing out birthday candles
  hu TP: szülinapi gyertyák elfújása
  EN FP: blowing up balloons
  hu FP: lufik felfújása
4713 | goodbye (noun): a farewell remark | loc: búcsú
  EN TS: They are waving goodbye.
  hu TS: Búcsút intenek.
  EN FS: They are waving hello.
  hu FS: Üdvözlésül intenek.
  EN TP: waving goodbye from a quay
  hu TP: búcsúintés a rakpartról
  EN FP: a goodbye letter
  hu FP: búcsúlevél
4714 | expert (noun): a person with special knowledge or skill | loc: szakértő
  EN TS: The expert says it's genuine.
  hu TS: A szakértő szerint eredeti.
  EN FS: The expert says it's fake.
  hu FS: A szakértő szerint hamisítvány.
  EN TP: an expert with a vase
  hu TP: szakértő egy vázával
  EN FP: an expert with a car
  hu FP: szakértő egy autóval
4715 | watermelon (noun): a very big green fruit, red and juicy inside | loc: görögdinnye
  EN TS: The watermelon exploded!
  hu TS: Felrobbant a görögdinnye!
  EN FS: The pumpkin exploded!
  hu FS: Felrobbant a tök!
  EN TP: a bursting watermelon
  hu TP: szétrobbanó görögdinnye
  EN FP: a sliced watermelon
  hu FP: felszeletelt görögdinnye
4716 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: felfedezni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is exploring the jungle like Indiana Jones.
  hu TS: Úgy fedezi fel a dzsungelt, mint Indiana Jones.
  EN FS: He is exploring the desert like Indiana Jones.
  hu FS: Úgy fedezi fel a sivatagot, mint Indiana Jones.
  EN TP: exploring a jungle cave
  hu TP: dzsungelbarlang felfedezése
  EN FP: exploring a big city
  hu FP: nagyváros felfedezése
4717 | dark (adjective): without light or brightness | loc: sötét
  EN TS: It is so dark in the tunnel!
  hu TS: Nagyon sötét van az alagútban!
  EN FS: It is so dark in the house!
  hu FS: Nagyon sötét van a házban!
  EN TP: a dark rock tunnel
  hu TP: sötét sziklaalagút
  EN FP: a dark night sky
  hu FP: sötét éjszakai égbolt
4718 | eye (noun): the organ of sight | loc: szem
  EN TS: Her brown eye fills the frame.
  hu TS: A barna szeme betölti a képet.
  EN FS: Her blue eye fills the frame.
  hu FS: A kék szeme betölti a képet.
  EN TP: a torch in an eye
  hu TP: zseblámpafény a szemben
  EN FP: an eye behind glasses
  hu FP: szem a szemüveg mögött
4719 | chin (noun): the part of the lower jaw that sticks out | loc: áll
  EN TS: The chin is round.
  hu TS: Az álla kerek.
  EN FS: The chin is pointed.
  hu FS: Az álla hegyes.
  EN TP: a rounded chin
  hu TP: kerek áll
  EN FP: a hand on the chin
  hu FP: kéz az állon
4720 | funny (adjective): arousing laughter | loc: vicces
  EN TS: Funny faces and zero shame!
  hu TS: Vicces fejek, nulla szégyen!
  EN FS: Funny hats and zero shame!
  hu FS: Vicces kalapok, nulla szégyen!
  EN TP: funny faces for the phone
  hu TP: vicces fejek a telefonnak
  EN FP: funny faces for the teacher
  hu FP: vicces fejek a tanárnak
4721 | fade (verb): to become less clearly visible | loc: elhalványulni
  EN TS: Nooo, the rainbow is fading!
  hu TS: Neee, elhalványul a szivárvány!
  EN FS: Nooo, the rainbow is growing!
  hu FS: Neee, egyre nagyobb a szivárvány!
  EN TP: a rainbow fading away
  hu TP: elhalványuló szivárvány
  EN FP: a photo fading away
  hu FP: elhalványuló fénykép
4722 | sunglasses (noun): dark spectacles that protect the eyes from the sun | loc: napszemüveg
  EN TS: Even the women in sunglasses are fainting!
  hu TS: Még a napszemüveges nők is elájulnak!
  EN FS: Even the women in sunglasses are dancing!
  hu FS: Még a napszemüveges nők is táncolnak!
  EN TP: women in dark sunglasses
  hu TP: nők sötét napszemüvegben
  EN FP: sunglasses on a sunny beach
  hu FP: napszemüveg a napos strandon
4723 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: esni
  EN TS: People are falling into foam.
  hu TS: Az emberek beleesnek a habba.
  EN FS: People are falling into water.
  hu FS: Az emberek beleesnek a vízbe.
  EN TP: falling into a foam pit
  hu TP: beleesni egy habgödörbe
  EN FP: falling into a pool
  hu FP: beleesni egy medencébe
4724 | to laugh (verb): to produce laughter | loc: nevetni
  EN TS: She can't stop laughing.
  hu TS: Nem bírja abbahagyni a nevetést.
  EN FS: She can't stop crying.
  hu FS: Nem bírja abbahagyni a sírást.
  EN TP: laughing in a foam pit
  hu TP: nevetés a habgödörben
  EN FP: laughing in a ball pit
  hu FP: nevetés a labdamedencében
4725 | pizza (noun): Italian bread dough baked with sauce and cheese | loc: pizza
  EN TS: The whole family made pizza.
  hu TS: Az egész család pizzát csinált.
  EN FS: The whole family made pasta.
  hu FS: Az egész család tésztát csinált.
  EN TP: making pizza dough
  hu TP: pizzatészta készítése
  EN FP: ordering pizza online
  hu FP: pizza rendelése online
4726 | farmer (noun): a person who operates a farm | loc: gazda
  EN TS: The farmer is pulling carrots.
  hu TS: A gazda répát húz.
  EN FS: The farmer is pulling onions.
  hu FS: A gazda hagymát húz.
  EN TP: a happy farmer at sunset
  hu TP: boldog gazda naplementekor
  EN FP: a tired farmer at dawn
  hu FP: fáradt gazda hajnalban
4727 | father (noun): a male parent | loc: apa
  EN TS: This father never gets tired.
  hu TS: Ez az apa sosem fárad el.
  EN FS: This mother never gets tired.
  hu FS: Ez az anya sosem fárad el.
  EN TP: a father playing catch
  hu TP: labdázó apa
  EN FP: a father watching TV
  hu FP: tévéző apa
4728 | sleep (verb): to be asleep | loc: aludni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sleeping on the sofa. Long day!
  hu TS: A kanapén alszik. Hosszú nap volt!
  EN FS: She is sleeping on the floor. Long day!
  hu FS: A padlón alszik. Hosszú nap volt!
  EN TP: sleeping on the sofa
  hu TP: alvás a kanapén
  EN FP: sleeping at work
  hu FP: alvás a munkahelyen
4729 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: ijedt
  EN TS: The mask made them afraid!
  hu TS: A maszktól ijedtek meg ennyire!
  EN FS: The clown made them afraid!
  hu FS: A bohóctól ijedtek meg ennyire!
  EN TP: afraid in a haunted house
  hu TP: ijedten egy kísértetházban
  EN FP: afraid of a spider
  hu FP: ijedt a póktól
4730 | committee (noun): a special group chosen to consider a matter | loc: bizottság
  EN TS: The committee has nine people.
  hu TS: A bizottság kilenc főből áll.
  EN FS: The committee has five people.
  hu FS: A bizottság öt főből áll.
  EN TP: a committee around a table
  hu TP: bizottság egy asztal körül
  EN FP: a committee on a stage
  hu FP: bizottság a színpadon
4731 | nation (noun): a large group who share a country and an identity | loc: nemzet
  EN TS: Each nation's flag is rising.
  hu TS: Minden nemzet zászlaja emelkedik.
  EN FS: Each nation's flag is falling.
  hu FS: Minden nemzet zászlaja süllyed.
  EN TP: the flag of every nation
  hu TP: minden nemzet zászlaja
  EN FP: the army of a nation
  hu FP: egy nemzet hadserege
4732 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: építeni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is building a wooden fence.
  hu TS: Fakerítést épít.
  EN FS: He is building a wooden shed.
  hu FS: Fészert épít.
  EN TP: building a garden fence
  hu TP: kerti kerítés építése
  EN FP: building a sandcastle
  hu FP: homokvár építése
4733 | temperature (noun): the degree of hotness or coldness of something | loc: hőmérséklet
  EN TS: His temperature is sky high!
  hu TS: Az egekben van a hőmérséklete!
  EN FS: His temperature is very low!
  hu FS: Nagyon alacsony a hőmérséklete!
  EN TP: taking his temperature
  hu TP: hőmérséklet mérése
  EN FP: the temperature outside
  hu FP: a kinti hőmérséklet
4734 | care (noun): the work of looking after someone | loc: gondoskodás
  EN TS: She is taking care of her.
  hu TS: Gondoskodik róla.
  EN FS: She is taking care of a dog.
  hu FS: Egy kutyáról gondoskodik.
  EN TP: loving care on the sofa
  hu TP: szerető gondoskodás a kanapén
  EN FP: skin care in the bathroom
  hu FP: bőrápolás a fürdőszobában
4735 | punch (noun): a blow with the fist | loc: ökölcsapás
  EN TS: She is throwing punches.
  hu TS: Ökölcsapásokat oszt.
  EN FS: She is blocking punches.
  hu FS: Ökölcsapásokat hárít.
  EN TP: punches into a padded shield
  hu TP: ökölcsapások a fogópárnára
  EN FP: a bowl of fruit punch
  hu FP: egy tál gyümölcspuncs
4736 | army (noun): a large group of soldiers who fight together | loc: hadsereg
  EN TS: The army is training on sand.
  hu TS: A hadsereg homokon edz.
  EN FS: The army is training in snow.
  hu FS: A hadsereg hóban edz.
  EN TP: an army training together
  hu TP: együtt edző hadsereg
  EN FP: an army at war
  hu FP: háborúzó hadsereg
4737 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: kancsó
  EN TS: She's pouring from a jug.
  hu TS: Kancsóból tölt.
  EN FS: She's pouring from a bottle.
  hu FS: Üvegből tölt.
  EN TP: pouring water from a jug
  hu TP: vizet tölt kancsóból
  EN FP: a jug of orange juice
  hu FP: egy kancsó narancslé
4738 | everywhere (adverb): in all places, all around you | loc: mindenhol
  EN TS: Her clothes are everywhere!
  hu TS: Mindenhol a ruhái!
  EN FS: Her books are everywhere!
  hu FS: Mindenhol a könyvei!
  EN TP: clothes everywhere
  hu TP: ruhák mindenhol
  EN FP: passports everywhere
  hu FP: útlevelek mindenhol
4739 | discover (verb): to discover that something is there | loc: felfedez
  EN TS: She discovered a huge diamond!
  hu TS: Felfedezett egy hatalmas gyémántot!
  EN FS: She discovered a huge ring!
  hu FS: Felfedezett egy hatalmas gyűrűt!
  EN TP: discovering a hidden diamond
  hu TP: rejtett gyémánt felfedezése
  EN FP: discovering a new country
  hu FP: új ország felfedezése
4740 | wound (noun): a cut or open injury on the skin | loc: seb
  EN TS: He will clean the wound now.
  hu TS: Most kitisztítja a sebet.
  EN FS: He will clean the bike now.
  hu FS: Most kitisztítja a biciklit.
  EN TP: cleaning a bleeding wound
  hu TP: vérző seb tisztítása
  EN FP: a wound on the face
  hu FP: seb az arcon
4741 | to pull (verb): to cause something to move by pulling | loc: húzni
  EN TS: He is pulling a fish out!
  hu TS: Egy halat húz ki!
  EN FS: He is pulling a boot out!
  hu FS: Egy csizmát húz ki!
  EN TP: to pull up a fish
  hu TP: halat kihúzni
  EN FP: to pull a boat ashore
  hu FP: csónakot partra húzni
4742 | strong (adjective): having more power or strength than normal | loc: erős
  EN TS: She is strong on the ropes!
  hu TS: Milyen erős a köteleken!
  EN FS: She is strong on the bike!
  hu FS: Milyen erős a biciklin!
  EN TP: strong arms and legs
  hu TP: erős karok és lábak
  EN FP: a strong cup of coffee
  hu FP: egy erős kávé
4743 | flight (noun): a journey traveling by air in a plane | loc: repülés
  EN TS: Juice! Best flight ever!
  hu TS: Gyümölcslé! Minden idők legjobb repülése!
  EN FS: Pizza! Best flight ever!
  hu FS: Pizza! Minden idők legjobb repülése!
  EN TP: a flight at sunset
  hu TP: repülés naplementekor
  EN FP: a flight of stairs
  hu FP: egy emeletnyi lépcső
4744 | to relax (verb): to rest and let your body go calm | loc: lazítani
  EN TS: She is relaxing on the water.
  hu TS: A vízen lazít.
  EN FS: She is relaxing on the sand.
  hu FS: A homokon lazít.
  EN TP: to relax on salty water
  hu TP: lazítani a sós vízen
  EN FP: relaxing in a hot bath
  hu FP: lazítás egy forró fürdőben
4745 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: folyni
  EN TS: The river flows past pebbles.
  hu TS: A folyó kavicsok mellett folyik.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  hu FS: A folyó házak mellett folyik.
  EN TP: water flowing downstream
  hu TP: lefelé folyó víz
  EN FP: water flowing from a tap
  hu FP: csapból folyó víz
4746 | photographer (noun): someone who takes photos as their job | loc: fényképész
  EN TS: The jet is flying over the photographers!
  hu TS: A sugárhajtású gép a fényképészek fölött repül!
  EN FS: The bird is flying over the photographers!
  hu FS: A madár a fényképészek fölött repül!
  EN TP: photographers at the runway
  hu TP: fényképészek a kifutónál
  EN FP: photographers at a wedding
  hu FP: fényképészek egy esküvőn
4747 | seagull (noun): a big white and grey bird that lives by the sea | loc: sirály
  EN TS: The seagulls want his bread!
  hu TS: A sirályok a kenyerét akarják!
  EN FS: The seagulls want his hat!
  hu FS: A sirályok a kalapját akarják!
  EN TP: seagulls around a ferry
  hu TP: sirályok egy komp körül
  EN FP: seagulls on a beach
  hu FP: sirályok a strandon
4748 | cloud (noun): a white or grey mass of water drops up in the sky | loc: felhő
  EN TS: Only clouds below the wing.
  hu TS: Csak felhők a szárny alatt.
  EN FS: Only mountains below the wing.
  hu FS: Csak hegyek a szárny alatt.
  EN TP: clouds below a plane
  hu TP: felhők a repülő alatt
  EN FP: clouds over the sea
  hu FP: felhők a tenger fölött
4749 | formation (noun): a group of people arranged as one unit | loc: alakzat
  EN TS: They're falling in formation!
  hu TS: Alakzatban zuhannak!
  EN FS: They're swimming in formation!
  hu FS: Alakzatban úsznak!
  EN TP: skydivers in a ring formation
  hu TP: ejtőernyősök kör alakzatban
  EN FP: a football team formation
  hu FP: focicsapat alakzata
4750 | clothes (noun): the clothing you wear | loc: ruhák
  EN TS: She built a castle of clothes.
  hu TS: Kastélyt épített a ruhákból.
  EN FS: She built a castle of books.
  hu FS: Kastélyt épített a könyvekből.
  EN TP: folding clean clothes
  hu TP: tiszta ruhák hajtogatása
  EN FP: washing dirty clothes
  hu FP: koszos ruhák mosása
4751 | guide (noun): a person who shows tourists around a place | loc: idegenvezető
  EN TS: Guide with a yellow umbrella.
  hu TS: Idegenvezető sárga esernyővel.
  EN FS: Guide with a red umbrella.
  hu FS: Idegenvezető piros esernyővel.
  EN TP: a guide with an umbrella
  hu TP: idegenvezető esernyővel
  EN FP: a guide in a museum
  hu FP: idegenvezető a múzeumban
4752 | failure (noun): an act that fails | loc: kudarc
  EN TS: Failure! The oven did it.
  hu TS: Kudarc! A sütő tehet róla.
  EN FS: Success! The oven did it.
  hu FS: Siker! A sütő tehet róla.
  EN TP: a baking failure
  hu TP: sütési kudarc
  EN FP: a failure in maths
  hu FP: kudarc matekból
4753 | forgive (verb): to stop blaming someone and forgive them | loc: megbocsát
  EN TS: Plot twist: he forgave him.
  hu TS: Csavar a sztoriban: megbocsátott neki.
  EN FS: Plot twist: he ignored him.
  hu FS: Csavar a sztoriban: levegőnek nézte.
  EN TP: forgiving an old friend
  hu TP: megbocsátás egy régi barátnak
  EN FP: forgiving his little brother
  hu FP: megbocsátás az öccsének
4754 | protest (verb): to say words that show you disagree | loc: tiltakozik
  EN TS: He is protesting: "Not me!"
  hu TS: A srác tiltakozik: „Nem én voltam!”
  EN FS: She is protesting: "Not me!"
  hu FS: A lány tiltakozik: „Nem én voltam!”
  EN TP: protesting to the referee
  hu TP: tiltakozás a bírónál
  EN FP: protesting in the street
  hu FP: tiltakozás az utcán
4755 | fracture (noun): a break or crack in a bone | loc: csonttörés
  EN TS: The X-ray shows a hand fracture.
  hu TS: A röntgenen csonttörés látszik a kézben.
  EN FS: The X-ray shows a leg fracture.
  hu FS: A röntgenen csonttörés látszik a lábban.
  EN TP: a fracture on an X-ray
  hu TP: csonttörés a röntgenképen
  EN FP: a fracture in a leg
  hu FP: csonttörés a lábban
4756 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: Franciaország
  EN TS: A baguette on a bike? That is France!
  hu TS: Bagett a biciklin? Ez Franciaország!
  EN FS: A pizza on a bike? That is France!
  hu FS: Pizza a biciklin? Ez Franciaország!
  EN TP: cycling in France
  hu TP: biciklizés Franciaországban
  EN FP: skiing in France
  hu FP: síelés Franciaországban
4757 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: szabadság
  EN TS: Summer freedom at last!
  hu TS: Végre nyári szabadság!
  EN FS: Winter freedom at last!
  hu FS: Végre téli szabadság!
  EN TP: freedom on an open road
  hu TP: szabadság a nyílt úton
  EN FP: freedom in a big city
  hu FP: szabadság a nagyvárosban
4758 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: tele
  EN TS: Now the fridge is full, bro!
  hu TS: Most már tele a hűtő, tesó!
  EN FS: Now the fridge is empty, bro!
  hu FS: Most már üres a hűtő, tesó!
  EN TP: a fridge full of food
  hu TP: hűtő tele kajával
  EN FP: a full washing machine
  hu FP: tele mosógép
4759 | baker (noun): someone who bakes bread and cakes as a job | loc: pék
  EN TS: The baker is talking into a baguette.
  hu TS: A pék egy bagettbe beszél.
  EN FS: The baker is talking into a croissant.
  hu FS: A pék egy croissant-ba beszél.
  EN TP: a baker with a baguette
  hu TP: pék bagettel
  EN FP: a baker making pizza
  hu FP: pizzát készítő pék
4760 | share (verb): to use one thing together with someone | loc: megosztani
  EN TS: They are sharing an ice cream.
  hu TS: Megosztanak egymással egy fagyit.
  EN FS: They are sharing a pizza.
  hu FS: Megosztanak egymással egy pizzát.
  EN TP: to share an ice cream
  hu TP: fagyit megosztani
  EN FP: to share a tram ticket
  hu FP: villamosjegyet megosztani
4761 | bacon (noun): salted and smoked meat from a pig's back | loc: szalonna
  EN TS: Bacon on a frozen lake!
  hu TS: Szalonna a befagyott tavon!
  EN FS: Bacon on a sandy beach!
  hu FS: Szalonna a homokos strandon!
  EN TP: frying bacon on the ice
  hu TP: szalonnasütés a jégen
  EN FP: bacon in a sandwich
  hu FP: szalonna egy szendvicsben
4762 | gallery (noun): a room where art is shown to the public | loc: galéria
  EN TS: He loves this gallery!
  hu TS: Imádja ezt a galériát!
  EN FS: He hates this gallery!
  hu FS: Utálja ezt a galériát!
  EN TP: a big art gallery
  hu TP: nagy művészeti galéria
  EN FP: a gallery full of cars
  hu FP: autókkal teli galéria
4763 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: gamer
  EN TS: These gamers are going crazy!
  hu TS: Ezek a gamerek teljesen megőrülnek!
  EN FS: These gamers are all asleep!
  hu FS: Ezek a gamerek mind alszanak!
  EN TP: gamers in an arena
  hu TP: gamerek egy arénában
  EN FP: a gamer in a classroom
  hu FP: gamer egy osztályteremben
4764 | sofa (noun): a long soft seat for more than one person | loc: kanapé
  EN TS: She is going wild on the sofa.
  hu TS: Teljesen bepörög a kanapén.
  EN FS: She is going wild on the bed.
  hu FS: Teljesen bepörög az ágyon.
  EN TP: jumping on the sofa
  hu TP: ugrálás a kanapén
  EN FP: sleeping on the sofa
  hu FP: alvás a kanapén
4765 | greenhouse (noun): a building with glass walls and roof | loc: üvegház
  EN TS: The garden features a greenhouse.
  hu TS: A kertben üvegház is található.
  EN FS: The garden features a swimming pool.
  hu FS: A kertben úszómedence is található.
  EN TP: a small glass greenhouse
  hu TP: kis üvegház
  EN FP: a big plastic greenhouse
  hu FP: nagy fóliaház
4766 | garden (verb): to work in the garden | loc: kertészkedni
  EN TS: She loves to garden.
  hu TS: Imád kertészkedni.
  EN FS: She loves to swim.
  hu FS: Imád úszni.
  EN TP: to garden among flowers
  hu TP: kertészkedni a virágok közt
  EN FP: to garden in the rain
  hu FP: kertészkedni az esőben
4767 | gardener (noun): a person who looks after a garden | loc: kertész
  EN TS: The gardener has big shears.
  hu TS: A kertésznek nagy metszőollója van.
  EN FS: The gardener has a big axe.
  hu FS: A kertésznek nagy fejszéje van.
  EN TP: a gardener with shears
  hu TP: kertész metszőollóval
  EN FP: a gardener with a hose
  hu FP: kertész slaggal
4768 | card (noun): a small piece of stiff paper used for games | loc: kártya
  EN TS: He has the winning cards.
  hu TS: Nála vannak a nyerő kártyák.
  EN FS: He has the winning dice.
  hu FS: Nála vannak a nyerő kockák.
  EN TP: two playing cards
  hu TP: két kártyalap
  EN FP: a birthday card
  hu FP: szülinapi képeslap
4769 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: kerítés
  EN TS: She is standing by a fence.
  hu TS: Egy kerítés mellett áll.
  EN FS: She is sitting on a fence.
  hu FS: Egy kerítésen ül.
  EN TP: a fence along the rim
  hu TP: kerítés a perem mentén
  EN FP: a fence around a garden
  hu FP: kerítés egy kert körül
4770 | boarding (noun): getting on a plane or ship as a passenger | loc: beszállás
  EN TS: Boarding is now in progress.
  hu TS: A beszállás folyamatban van.
  EN FS: Landing is now in progress.
  hu FS: A leszállás folyamatban van.
  EN TP: boarding through a jet bridge
  hu TP: beszállás utashídon át
  EN FP: boarding at a train station
  hu FP: beszállás a vasútállomáson
4771 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: palota
  EN TS: Gate, gate, gate... palace!
  hu TS: Kapu, kapu, kapu... palota!
  EN FS: Gate, gate, gate... church!
  hu FS: Kapu, kapu, kapu... templom!
  EN TP: a gate to a palace
  hu TP: kapu egy palotához
  EN FP: a palace in a city
  hu FP: palota a városban
4772 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: madárraj
  EN TS: A huge flock is in the sky.
  hu TS: Hatalmas madárraj az égen.
  EN FS: A huge flock is on the water.
  hu FS: Hatalmas madárraj a vízen.
  EN TP: a flock of starlings
  hu TP: seregélyekből álló madárraj
  EN FP: a flock on a lake
  hu FP: madárraj egy tavon
4773 | gathering (noun): a group of people together in one place | loc: gyülekezet | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc gyülekezet means a church congregation; used csődület (crowd gathering around a busker)
  EN TS: The music started a gathering.
  hu TS: A zene csődületet csinált.
  EN FS: The music started a fight.
  hu FS: A zene verekedést csinált.
  EN TP: a gathering around a busker
  hu TP: csődület egy utcazenész körül
  EN FP: a family gathering at home
  hu FP: családi összejövetel otthon
4774 | generation (noun): all the people of about the same age alive now | loc: generáció
  EN TS: Every generation is laughing under the apple tree.
  hu TS: Minden generáció nevet az almafa alatt.
  EN FS: Every generation is laughing under the palm tree.
  hu FS: Minden generáció nevet a pálmafa alatt.
  EN TP: generations in a garden
  hu TP: generációk egy kertben
  EN FP: generations at a dinner table
  hu FP: generációk az ebédlőasztalnál
4775 | newborn (adjective): born a very short time ago | loc: újszülött
  EN TS: The newborn has four fans already.
  hu TS: Az újszülöttnek már négy rajongója van.
  EN FS: The newborn has two fans already.
  hu FS: Az újszülöttnek már két rajongója van.
  EN TP: a newborn baby asleep
  hu TP: alvó újszülött baba
  EN FP: a newborn lamb
  hu FP: újszülött bárány
4776 | polite (adjective): showing good manners towards other people | loc: udvarias
  EN TS: So polite: he is lifting his hat.
  hu TS: Milyen udvarias: megemeli a kalapját.
  EN FS: So polite: he is lifting his cane.
  hu FS: Milyen udvarias: megemeli a sétapálcáját.
  EN TP: a polite greeting
  hu TP: udvarias köszönés
  EN FP: a polite letter
  hu FP: udvarias levél
4777 | helpful (adjective): providing useful help to other people | loc: segítőkész
  EN TS: He is helpful to everyone.
  hu TS: Mindenkivel segítőkész.
  EN FS: He is rude to everyone.
  hu FS: Mindenkivel bunkó.
  EN TP: a helpful old gentleman
  hu TP: segítőkész idős úr
  EN FP: a helpful young waiter
  hu FP: segítőkész fiatal pincér
4778 | workshop (noun): a small workplace where things are made | loc: műhely
  EN TS: This workshop produces clocks.
  hu TS: Ez a műhely órákat készít.
  EN FS: This workshop produces shoes.
  hu FS: Ez a műhely cipőket készít.
  EN TP: a small clock workshop
  hu TP: kis órásműhely
  EN FP: a small writing workshop
  hu FP: kis íróműhely
4779 | germany (noun): the country in central Europe, capital Berlin | loc: Németország
  EN TS: He is having fun in Germany!
  hu TS: A srác jól érzi magát Németországban!
  EN FS: She is having fun in Germany!
  hu FS: A lány jól érzi magát Németországban!
  EN TP: a trip around Germany
  hu TP: körutazás Németországban
  EN FP: a job in Germany
  hu FP: munka Németországban
4780 | separate (adjective): independent, not joined to each other | loc: különálló
  EN TS: They are leaving through separate doors.
  hu TS: Két különálló ajtón mennek ki.
  EN FS: They are leaving through the same door.
  hu FS: Ugyanazon az ajtón mennek ki.
  EN TP: two separate doors
  hu TP: két különálló ajtó
  EN FP: two separate tables
  hu FP: két különálló asztal
4781 | marry (verb): to take someone as your husband or wife | loc: összeházasodni
  EN TS: She is marrying him!
  hu TS: Összeházasodnak!
  EN FS: She is leaving him!
  hu FS: Szakítanak!
  EN TP: to marry in a garden
  hu TP: összeházasodni egy kertben
  EN FP: to marry on a beach
  hu FP: összeházasodni a tengerparton
4782 | playground (noun): an open area where people go to play | loc: játszótér
  EN TS: She owns the playground!
  hu TS: Övé a játszótér!
  EN FS: She owns the classroom!
  hu FS: Övé az osztályterem!
  EN TP: playing in the playground
  hu TP: játék a játszótéren
  EN FP: an empty playground
  hu FP: üres játszótér
4783 | couple (noun): two people in a romantic relationship | loc: pár
  EN TS: The couple is covered in cake!
  hu TS: A pár csupa torta!
  EN FS: The couple is covered in mud!
  hu FS: A pár csupa sár!
  EN TP: a couple with cake faces
  hu TP: tortás arcú pár
  EN FP: a couple on a bike
  hu FP: pár egy biciklin
4784 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: adni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is giving her a present.
  hu TS: Ajándékot ad neki.
  EN FS: He is giving her a phone.
  hu FS: Telefont ad neki.
  EN TP: giving a wrapped present
  hu TP: becsomagolt ajándékot ad
  EN FP: giving a big speech
  hu FP: nagy beszédet tart
4785 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: terasz
  EN TS: Cheers on the terrace!
  hu TS: Egészségünkre a teraszon!
  EN FS: Cheers in the kitchen!
  hu FS: Egészségünkre a konyhában!
  EN TP: juice on a sunny terrace
  hu TP: gyümölcslé a napos teraszon
  EN FP: a rooftop terrace party
  hu FP: tetőterasz-buli
4786 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: csillog
  EN TS: The sand is sparkling blue!
  hu TS: Kéken csillog a homok!
  EN FS: The sand is sparkling red!
  hu FS: Pirosan csillog a homok!
  EN TP: sand sparkling at night
  hu TP: éjjel csillogó homok
  EN FP: sand sparkling in the sun
  hu FP: napfényben csillogó homok
4787 | valuable (adjective): worth a great amount of money or value | loc: értékes
  EN TS: This pan is very valuable.
  hu TS: Ez a serpenyő nagyon értékes.
  EN FS: This pan is totally empty.
  hu FS: Ez a serpenyő teljesen üres.
  EN TP: a valuable pan of gold
  hu TP: értékes serpenyőnyi arany
  EN FP: a valuable old painting
  hu FP: értékes régi festmény
4788 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: döbbent
  EN TS: Salon gossip. Everyone is shocked.
  hu TS: Szalonpletyka. Mindenki döbbent.
  EN FS: Salon gossip. Everyone is bored.
  hu FS: Szalonpletyka. Mindenki unatkozik.
  EN TP: shocked by salon gossip
  hu TP: döbbenten a pletykától
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  hu FP: döbbenten az ár láttán
4789 | authority (noun): the power to give orders and make decisions | loc: hatalom
  EN TS: She has full authority.
  hu TS: A nőnek teljes hatalma van.
  EN FS: He has full authority.
  hu FS: A férfinak teljes hatalma van.
  EN TP: a woman with authority
  hu TP: hatalommal bíró nő
  EN FP: authority over an army
  hu FP: hatalom egy hadsereg felett
4790 | conflict (noun): an open clash between two opposing sides | loc: konfliktus
  EN TS: Conflict at the big table, and papers are flying!
  hu TS: Konfliktus a nagy asztalnál, és repkednek a papírok!
  EN FS: Peace at the big table, and papers are flying!
  hu FS: Béke a nagy asztalnál, és repkednek a papírok!
  EN TP: a conflict at the table
  hu TP: konfliktus az asztalnál
  EN FP: a conflict on the street
  hu FP: konfliktus az utcán
4791 | papers (noun): official writing that gives you information | loc: iratok
  EN TS: She is setting down papers.
  hu TS: Iratokat tesz le.
  EN FS: She is setting down flowers.
  hu FS: Virágokat tesz le.
  EN TP: a folder of papers
  hu TP: egy mappa irat
  EN FP: papers on the floor
  hu FP: iratok a padlón
4792 | to plant (verb): to put seeds or young plants into the ground | loc: ültetni
  EN TS: They are planting flowers.
  hu TS: Virágokat ültetnek.
  EN FS: They are picking flowers.
  hu FS: Virágokat szednek.
  EN TP: planting a young flower
  hu TP: fiatal virág ültetése
  EN FP: planting a flag
  hu FP: zászlót tűz ki
4793 | sand (verb): to rub something smooth with sandpaper | loc: csiszolni
  EN TS: They are sanding a birdhouse.
  hu TS: Egy madárodút csiszolnak.
  EN FS: They are painting a birdhouse.
  hu FS: Egy madárodút festenek.
  EN TP: sanding a wooden roof
  hu TP: fatető csiszolása
  EN FP: sanding a wooden floor
  hu FP: fapadló csiszolása
4794 | grandmother (noun): the mother of your mother or father | loc: nagymama
  EN TS: Grandmother's cookies win.
  hu TS: Nagymama sütije nyer.
  EN FS: Grandmother's pizza wins.
  hu FS: Nagymama pizzája nyer.
  EN TP: cookies from grandmother
  hu TP: süti a nagymamától
  EN FP: cookies from a shop
  hu FP: süti a boltból
4795 | to bake (verb): to cook food by putting it in a hot oven | loc: sütni
  EN TS: She baked cookies. Best day!
  hu TS: Sütit sütött. Legjobb nap!
  EN FS: She baked a pie. Best day!
  hu FS: Pitét sütött. Legjobb nap!
  EN TP: baked chocolate cookies
  hu TP: frissen sütött csokis sütik
  EN FP: baked apple pies
  hu FP: frissen sütött almás piték
4796 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: egyensúlyozni
  EN TS: He is balancing two cards. Careful!
  hu TS: Két kártyát egyensúlyoz. Óvatosan!
  EN FS: He is balancing two cups. Careful!
  hu FS: Két csészét egyensúlyoz. Óvatosan!
  EN TP: balancing playing cards
  hu TP: kártyalapok egyensúlyozása
  EN FP: balancing on one leg
  hu FP: egyensúlyozás egy lábon
4797 | little (adjective): below average in number or quantity | loc: kevés
  EN TS: He adds just a little cheese.
  hu TS: Csak egy kevés sajtot tesz rá.
  EN FS: He adds just a little sauce.
  hu FS: Csak egy kevés szószt tesz rá.
  EN TP: a little extra cheese
  hu TP: egy kevés extra sajt
  EN FP: a little extra pepper
  hu FP: egy kevés extra bors
4798 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: templom | translator note: loc templom also means church; FS uses kápolna (chapel) so the false text stays distinct
  EN TS: She is walking to a temple.
  hu TS: Egy templomhoz sétál.
  EN FS: She is walking to a church.
  hu FS: Egy kápolnához sétál.
  EN TP: an old hilltop temple
  hu TP: régi templom a hegytetőn
  EN FP: an old hilltop castle
  hu FP: régi vár a hegytetőn
4799 | tie (verb): to fasten something with a cord or string | loc: megkötni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Tying a bow tie? Nervous work!
  hu TS: Csokornyakkendőt köt? Idegőrlő meló!
  EN FS: Tying his shoes? Nervous work!
  hu FS: A cipőjét köti? Idegőrlő meló!
  EN TP: tying a black bow tie
  hu TP: fekete csokornyakkendő megkötése
  EN FP: tying up the suitcase
  hu FP: bőrönd átkötése
4800 | groom (noun): the man who is getting married at a wedding | loc: vőlegény
  EN TS: The groom is so nervous!
  hu TS: A vőlegény nagyon ideges!
  EN FS: The bride is so nervous!
  hu FS: A menyasszony nagyon ideges!
  EN TP: a nervous groom
  hu TP: ideges vőlegény
  EN FP: a groom feeding a horse
  hu FP: lovat etető vőlegény
4801 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: magas
  EN TS: This sunflower is so tall!
  hu TS: Milyen magas ez a napraforgó!
  EN FS: This cactus is so tall!
  hu FS: Milyen magas ez a kaktusz!
  EN TP: a tall sunflower
  hu TP: magas napraforgó
  EN FP: a tall tree
  hu FP: magas fa
4802 | museum (noun): a building for displaying valuable old objects | loc: múzeum
  EN TS: This guard is the museum boss.
  hu TS: Ez az őr a múzeum főnöke.
  EN FS: This cook is the museum boss.
  hu FS: Ez a szakács a múzeum főnöke.
  EN TP: a museum guard
  hu TP: múzeumi őr
  EN FP: a guard at a bank
  hu FP: őr egy bankban
4803 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: virágcsokor
  EN TS: She brought a bouquet.
  hu TS: Virágcsokrot hozott.
  EN FS: She brought a cake.
  hu FS: Tortát hozott.
  EN TP: a bouquet for the host
  hu TP: virágcsokor a háziaknak
  EN FP: a bouquet for a bride
  hu FP: virágcsokor egy menyasszonynak
4804 | tour (verb): to make a trip round a place to see it | loc: bejárni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are touring a blue town.
  hu TS: Egy kék várost járnak be.
  EN FS: They are touring a red town.
  hu FS: Egy piros várost járnak be.
  EN TP: touring a blue town
  hu TP: kék város bejárása
  EN FP: touring with a rock band
  hu FP: turné egy rockbandával
4805 | church (noun): a place where Christians go to worship | loc: templom
  EN TS: He is pointing at a church.
  hu TS: Egy templomra mutat.
  EN FS: He is pointing at a boat.
  hu FS: Egy hajóra mutat.
  EN TP: a domed church
  hu TP: kupolás templom
  EN FP: a wooden church
  hu FP: fatemplom
4806 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: kupola
  EN TS: A dome is behind his book.
  hu TS: Egy kupola van a könyve mögött.
  EN FS: A crane is behind his book.
  hu FS: Egy daru van a könyve mögött.
  EN TP: a dome on the skyline
  hu TP: kupola a láthatáron
  EN FP: a dome tent for camping
  hu FP: kupolasátor kempingezéshez
4807 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: narancssárga
  EN TS: He is wearing an orange top.
  hu TS: Narancssárga felsőt visel.
  EN FS: He is wearing an orange cap.
  hu FS: Narancssárga sapkát visel.
  EN TP: an orange sports top
  hu TP: narancssárga sportfelső
  EN FP: an orange sports car
  hu FP: narancssárga sportautó
4808 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: fonat
  EN TS: The stylist is making a braid.
  hu TS: A fodrász fonatot készít.
  EN FS: The stylist is making a bun.
  hu FS: A fodrász kontyot készít.
  EN TP: weaving a long braid
  hu TP: hosszú fonat fonása
  EN FP: cutting a long braid
  hu FP: hosszú fonat levágása
4809 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: folyosó
  EN TS: It's rush hour in the corridor.
  hu TS: Csúcsforgalom van a folyosón.
  EN FS: It's rush hour in the bathroom.
  hu FS: Csúcsforgalom van a fürdőszobában.
  EN TP: a corridor full of shoes
  hu TP: cipőkkel teli folyosó
  EN FP: a long hotel corridor
  hu FP: hosszú szállodai folyosó
4810 | post (noun): a piece of timber fixed upright in the ground | loc: cölöp
  EN TS: He is hammering a post in.
  hu TS: Beveri a cölöpöt.
  EN FS: He is hammering a nail in.
  hu FS: Beveri a szöget.
  EN TP: a post in the ground
  hu TP: cölöp a földben
  EN FP: a post on social media
  hu FP: poszt a közösségi médián
4811 | teammate (noun): someone who is on the same team as you | loc: csapattárs
  EN TS: The teammates are hyped up.
  hu TS: A csapattársak be vannak pörögve.
  EN FS: The teammates are fighting.
  hu FS: A csapattársak verekednek.
  EN TP: hands in with teammates
  hu TP: kezek középen a csapattársakkal
  EN FP: arguing with teammates
  hu FP: vita a csapattársakkal
4812 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: rendezett
  EN TS: His wardrobe is super tidy.
  hu TS: A gardróbja szuper rendezett.
  EN FS: His wardrobe is super messy.
  hu FS: A gardróbja szuper rendetlen.
  EN TP: a tidy row of shirts
  hu TP: rendezett ingsor
  EN FP: a tidy pile of shoes
  hu FP: rendezett cipőkupac
4813 | harbour (noun): a sheltered place on the coast for boats | loc: kikötő
  EN TS: The harbour is busy.
  hu TS: Nyüzsög a kikötő.
  EN FS: The harbour is empty.
  hu FS: Üres a kikötő.
  EN TP: a busy harbour at sunrise
  hu TP: nyüzsgő kikötő napfelkeltekor
  EN FP: a harbour in a storm
  hu FP: kikötő viharban
4814 | to pick (verb): to take leaves or fruit off a plant | loc: szedni
  EN TS: The team is picking tomatoes.
  hu TS: A csapat paradicsomot szed.
  EN FS: The team is picking apples.
  hu FS: A csapat almát szed.
  EN TP: picking a red tomato
  hu TP: piros paradicsomot szed
  EN FP: picking a red apple
  hu FP: piros almát szed
4815 | rub (verb): to move your hand over something with pressure | loc: dörzsölni
  EN TS: Office stress: rubbing her temples.
  hu TS: Irodai stressz: a halántékát dörzsöli.
  EN FS: Office stress: rubbing her feet.
  hu FS: Irodai stressz: a lábát dörzsöli.
  EN TP: rubbing her temples
  hu TP: a halántékát dörzsöli
  EN FP: rubbing her hands together
  hu FP: a kezét dörzsöli
4816 | heart (noun): the muscular organ in your chest | loc: szív
  EN TS: Her heart is racing!
  hu TS: Hevesen ver a szíve!
  EN FS: Her heart is resting!
  hu FS: Nyugodtan pihen a szíve!
  EN TP: a hand over the heart
  hu TP: kéz a szíven
  EN FP: a heart on her shirt
  hu FP: szív a pólóján
4817 | drought (noun): a long time with a shortage of rain | loc: aszály
  EN TS: Even the tree melts in this drought.
  hu TS: Ebben az aszályban még a fa is olvad.
  EN FS: Even the dog melts in this drought.
  hu FS: Ebben az aszályban még a kutya is olvad.
  EN TP: a drought with cracked ground
  hu TP: aszály repedezett földdel
  EN FP: the end of a drought
  hu FP: az aszály vége
4818 | heel (noun): the rounded back part of the foot | loc: sarok
  EN TS: Spikes under the heel? Crazy!
  hu TS: Tüskék a sarok alatt? Őrület!
  EN FS: Wheels under the heel? Crazy!
  hu FS: Kerekek a sarok alatt? Őrület!
  EN TP: a spike under the heel
  hu TP: tüske a sarok alatt
  EN FP: the heel of a shoe
  hu FP: a cipő sarka
4819 | grateful (adjective): feeling or showing thanks to someone | loc: hálás
  EN TS: The old woman is grateful.
  hu TS: Az idős nő hálás.
  EN FS: The old man is grateful.
  hu FS: Az idős férfi hálás.
  EN TP: grateful for the umbrella
  hu TP: hálás az esernyőért
  EN FP: grateful for the taxi
  hu FP: hálás a taxiért
4820 | same (adjective): the same one, not a different one | loc: ugyanaz
  EN TS: They have the same dress!
  hu TS: Ugyanaz a ruhájuk!
  EN FS: They have the same bag!
  hu FS: Ugyanaz a táskájuk!
  EN TP: the same patterned dress
  hu TP: ugyanaz a mintás ruha
  EN FP: the same shoes
  hu FP: ugyanaz a cipő
4821 | sunset (noun): the evening moment when the sun goes down | loc: naplemente
  EN TS: Sunset pizza is here!
  hu TS: Megjött a naplementés pizza!
  EN FS: Sunset sushi is here!
  hu FS: Megjött a naplementés sushi!
  EN TP: pizza delivery at sunset
  hu TP: pizzaszállítás naplementekor
  EN FP: a sunset over the mountains
  hu FP: naplemente a hegyek fölött
4822 | message (noun): a short written or spoken communication | loc: üzenet
  EN TS: The message made her so happy.
  hu TS: Az üzenet nagyon boldoggá tette.
  EN FS: The message made her so sad.
  hu FS: Az üzenet nagyon szomorúvá tette.
  EN TP: reading a happy message
  hu TP: örömteli üzenet olvasása
  EN FP: a message on the fridge
  hu FP: üzenet a hűtőn
4823 | depth (noun): how far downward something goes | loc: mélység
  EN TS: He is diving to a great depth.
  hu TS: Nagy mélységbe merül.
  EN FS: He is diving to a small depth.
  hu FS: Kis mélységbe merül.
  EN TP: diving to a great depth
  hu TP: merülés nagy mélységbe
  EN FP: the depth of a pool
  hu FP: a medence mélysége
4824 | pretend (verb): to make believe something is real | loc: színlelni
  EN TS: Her horse is fake, but she pretends well.
  hu TS: A lova kamu, de jól színlel.
  EN FS: Her horse is fake, but she swims well.
  hu FS: A lova kamu, de jól úszik.
  EN TP: pretending to ride a horse
  hu TP: lovaglást színlel
  EN FP: pretending to be asleep
  hu FP: alvást színlel
4825 | to wipe (verb): to clean a surface by rubbing it with a cloth | loc: áttörölni
  EN TS: Worktop wiped. Kitchen done.
  hu TS: Pult áttörölve. Konyha kész.
  EN FS: Window wiped. Kitchen done.
  hu FS: Ablak áttörölve. Konyha kész.
  EN TP: wiping the white worktop
  hu TP: a fehér munkalap áttörlése
  EN FP: wiping away tears
  hu FP: könnyek letörlése
4826 | dam (noun): a barrier built to hold back water | loc: gát
  EN TS: The dam is overflowing!
  hu TS: Túlcsordul a gát!
  EN FS: The pool is overflowing!
  hu FS: Túlcsordul a medence!
  EN TP: an overflowing dam
  hu TP: túlcsorduló gát
  EN FP: a dry dam in summer
  hu FP: kiszáradt gát nyáron
4827 | paint (noun): a coloured substance you put on a surface | loc: festék
  EN TS: This orange paint is thick.
  hu TS: Ez a narancssárga festék vastag.
  EN FS: This blue paint is thick.
  hu FS: Ez a kék festék vastag.
  EN TP: a thick slab of paint
  hu TP: vastag festékcsík
  EN FP: a fresh coat of paint
  hu FP: friss festékréteg
4828 | wall (noun): a flat side of a room, taller than its thickness | loc: fal
  EN TS: Half the wall is green now.
  hu TS: A fal fele már zöld.
  EN FS: Half the wall is blue now.
  hu FS: A fal fele már kék.
  EN TP: a half-green wall
  hu TP: félig zöld fal
  EN FP: a green garden wall
  hu FP: zöld kerti fal
4829 | chip (noun): a small piece broken off something | loc: szilánk
  EN TS: Paint chips are falling off.
  hu TS: Festékszilánkok potyognak le.
  EN FS: Paint drops are falling off.
  hu FS: Festékcseppek potyognak le.
  EN TP: chips of old paint
  hu TP: régi festék szilánkjai
  EN FP: chips of old glass
  hu FP: régi üveg szilánkjai
4830 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: úszni
  EN TS: Two divers are swimming up.
  hu TS: Két búvár úszik felfelé.
  EN FS: Three divers are swimming up.
  hu FS: Három búvár úszik felfelé.
  EN TP: swimming up to the surface
  hu TP: úszás fel a felszínre
  EN FP: to swim across the river
  hu FP: átúszni a folyót
4831 | hit (noun): a successful stroke of the bat in baseball | loc: ütés
  EN TS: What a big hit!
  hu TS: Micsoda nagy ütés!
  EN FS: What a big miss!
  hu FS: Micsoda nagy kihagyás!
  EN TP: a hit off a tee
  hu TP: ütés az ütőállványról
  EN FP: a hit on the radio
  hu FP: sláger a rádióban
4832 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: gerinc
  EN TS: A thin ridge above the clouds.
  hu TS: Keskeny gerinc a felhők fölött.
  EN FS: A wide ridge above the clouds.
  hu FS: Széles gerinc a felhők fölött.
  EN TP: a thin snow ridge
  hu TP: keskeny havas gerinc
  EN FP: a ridge of green hills
  hu FP: zöld dombok gerince
4833 | coast (noun): the land right along the edge of the sea | loc: tengerpart
  EN TS: He is skating along the coast like it is nothing.
  hu TS: Úgy gördeszkázik a tengerpart mentén, mintha semmiség lenne.
  EN FS: He is cycling along the coast like it is nothing.
  hu FS: Úgy biciklizik a tengerpart mentén, mintha semmiség lenne.
  EN TP: skating down the coast road
  hu TP: gördeszkázás a tengerparti úton
  EN FP: sailing along the coast
  hu FP: vitorlázás a tengerpart mentén
4834 | toy (noun): a thing designed to be played with | loc: játék
  EN TS: This toy battle is epic!
  hu TS: Ez a játékcsata epikus!
  EN FS: This card battle is epic!
  hu FS: Ez a kártyacsata epikus!
  EN TP: a spinning toy
  hu TP: pörgő játék
  EN FP: a toy car
  hu FP: játékautó
4835 | city (noun): a large crowded area of streets and buildings | loc: város
  EN TS: A chase is on in the city!
  hu TS: Üldözés zajlik a városban!
  EN FS: A parade is on in the city!
  hu FS: Felvonulás zajlik a városban!
  EN TP: a city street at night
  hu TP: városi utca éjjel
  EN FP: a city street at noon
  hu FP: városi utca délben
4836 | saw (verb): to cut something using a saw | loc: fűrészelni
  EN TS: He is sawing out a bear.
  hu TS: Egy medvét fűrészel ki.
  EN FS: He is sawing out a horse.
  hu FS: Egy lovat fűrészel ki.
  EN TP: sawing a bear from wood
  hu TP: medve kifűrészelése fából
  EN FP: sawing a plank in half
  hu FP: deszka kettéfűrészelése
4837 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: asztal
  EN TS: The table is full of food.
  hu TS: Az asztal tele van étellel.
  EN FS: The table is full of books.
  hu FS: Az asztal tele van könyvekkel.
  EN TP: a table full of food
  hu TP: étellel teli asztal
  EN FP: a table full of games
  hu FP: társasjátékokkal teli asztal
4838 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: dobni
  EN TS: She is throwing a ball.
  hu TS: Labdát dob.
  EN FS: She is kicking a ball.
  hu FS: Labdát rúg.
  EN TP: to throw a beach ball
  hu TP: strandlabdát dobni
  EN FP: to throw a party
  hu FP: bulit dobni
4839 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: mozogni | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc mozogni is intransitive (to move oneself); used megmozdít/mozgatás for moving a car
  EN TS: He can move a car alone!
  hu TS: Egyedül is megmozdít egy autót!
  EN FS: He can move a bus alone!
  hu FS: Egyedül is megmozdít egy buszt!
  EN TP: moving heavy things
  hu TP: nehéz dolgok mozgatása
  EN FP: moving to a new city
  hu FP: költözés új városba
4840 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: elbújni
  EN TS: They hid for a surprise!
  hu TS: Elbújtak a meglepetés kedvéért!
  EN FS: They hid from a dog!
  hu FS: Elbújtak egy kutya elől!
  EN TP: hiding behind the sofa
  hu TP: elbújni a kanapé mögött
  EN FP: hiding under the bed
  hu FP: elbújni az ágy alatt
4841 | key (noun): a small metal device that turns in a lock | loc: kulcs
  EN TS: She found the key! Finally!
  hu TS: Megtalálta a kulcsot! Végre!
  EN FS: She found the phone! Finally!
  hu FS: Megtalálta a telefont! Végre!
  EN TP: finding a small key
  hu TP: kis kulcs megtalálása
  EN FP: losing a small key
  hu FP: kis kulcs elvesztése
4842 | to work (verb): to do physical or mental work for a purpose | loc: dolgozni
  EN TS: He is working on an old car.
  hu TS: Egy régi autón dolgozik.
  EN FS: He is working on an old bike.
  hu FS: Egy régi biciklin dolgozik.
  EN TP: working on a car engine
  hu TP: autómotoron dolgozni
  EN FP: working in an office
  hu FP: irodában dolgozni
4843 | structure (noun): a thing built from many parts | loc: szerkezet
  EN TS: That is one big wooden structure!
  hu TS: Ez aztán egy nagy, fából készült szerkezet!
  EN FS: That is one big metal structure!
  hu FS: Ez aztán egy nagy, fémből készült szerkezet!
  EN TP: a wooden house structure
  hu TP: egy ház fa szerkezete
  EN FP: the structure of a sentence
  hu FP: a mondat szerkezete
4844 | half (noun): one of two equal parts of something | loc: fél
  EN TS: She cut the pumpkin in half.
  hu TS: Félbevágta a tököt.
  EN FS: She cut the cake in half.
  hu FS: Félbevágta a tortát.
  EN TP: a pumpkin cut in half
  hu TP: félbevágott tök
  EN FP: half a pumpkin pie
  hu FP: fél tökös pite
4845 | cloth (noun): material made by weaving or knitting fibers | loc: kelme
  EN TS: Hands are sewing the cloth.
  hu TS: Kezek varrják a kelmét.
  EN FS: Hands are cutting the cloth.
  hu FS: Kezek vágják a kelmét.
  EN TP: stitching the cloth
  hu TP: kelme varrása
  EN FP: wiping with a cloth
  hu FP: törlés egy ronggyal
4846 | iron (verb): to press clothes smooth with a hot iron | loc: vasalni
  EN TS: Ironing done: one flat sheet.
  hu TS: Vasalás kész: egy sima lepedő.
  EN FS: Ironing done: one flat towel.
  hu FS: Vasalás kész: egy sima törölköző.
  EN TP: ironing a white sheet
  hu TP: fehér lepedő vasalása
  EN FP: ironing out a problem
  hu FP: probléma elsimítása
4847 | floor (noun): the flat inside surface of a room you walk on | loc: padló
  EN TS: What a clean floor!
  hu TS: Milyen tiszta a padló!
  EN FS: What a dirty floor!
  hu FS: Milyen koszos a padló!
  EN TP: mopping the floor
  hu TP: a padló felmosása
  EN FP: painting the floor
  hu FP: a padló festése
4848 | grow (verb): to get bigger gradually, the way a plant does | loc: nőni | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc nőni is intransitive (to grow oneself); growing a pumpkin = termeszteni
  EN TS: Look what she grew: a pumpkin!
  hu TS: Nézd, mit termesztett: egy tököt!
  EN FS: Look what she grew: a melon!
  hu FS: Nézd, mit termesztett: egy dinnyét!
  EN TP: growing a big pumpkin
  hu TP: nagy tök termesztése
  EN FP: growing a long beard
  hu FP: hosszú szakáll növesztése
4849 | summer (noun): the warmest season of the year | loc: nyár
  EN TS: Summer: water for everyone!
  hu TS: Nyár: víz mindenkinek!
  EN FS: Summer: cake for everyone!
  hu FS: Nyár: torta mindenkinek!
  EN TP: a summer garden sprinkler
  hu TP: nyári kerti locsoló
  EN FP: a summer beach day
  hu FP: nyári strandnap
4850 | camera (noun): the equipment you use for taking photographs | loc: fényképezőgép
  EN TS: He is pointing a camera at us!
  hu TS: Fényképezőgépet szegez ránk!
  EN FS: He is pointing a phone at us!
  hu FS: Telefont szegez ránk!
  EN TP: a camera on a tripod
  hu TP: fényképezőgép állványon
  EN FP: a camera in a shop
  hu FP: fényképezőgép egy boltban
4851 | ancient (adjective): very old, from thousands of years ago | loc: ősi
  EN TS: She found an ancient tablet!
  hu TS: Egy ősi táblát talált!
  EN FS: She found an ancient sword!
  hu FS: Egy ősi kardot talált!
  EN TP: an ancient stone tablet
  hu TP: ősi kőtábla
  EN FP: an ancient ship
  hu FP: ősi hajó
4852 | gear (noun): a toothed wheel that turns inside a machine | loc: fogaskerék
  EN TS: Huge gears at the end!
  hu TS: Hatalmas fogaskerekek a végén!
  EN FS: Tiny gears at the end!
  hu FS: Apró fogaskerekek a végén!
  EN TP: huge interlocking gears
  hu TP: egymásba kapó hatalmas fogaskerekek
  EN FP: bike gears
  hu FP: bicikli fogaskerekei
4853 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: pici
  EN TS: That cog is super tiny.
  hu TS: Az a fogaskerék szuper pici.
  EN FS: That screw is super tiny.
  hu FS: Az a csavar szuper pici.
  EN TP: a tiny brass cog
  hu TP: pici réz fogaskerék
  EN FP: a tiny kitchen
  hu FP: pici konyha
4854 | solve (verb): to find the solution to a problem | loc: megoldani | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is solving a huge problem!
  hu TS: Egy óriási problémát old meg!
  EN FS: He is solving a tiny problem!
  hu FS: Egy apró problémát old meg!
  EN TP: solving maths on a board
  hu TP: matekfeladat megoldása a táblán
  EN FP: solving a crime
  hu FP: bűntény megoldása
4855 | remember (verb): to recall something from your memory | loc: emlékezni
  EN TS: He wants to remember every word in the world.
  hu TS: Minden szóra emlékezni akar a világon.
  EN FS: He wants to forget every word in the world.
  hu FS: Minden szót el akar felejteni a világon.
  EN TP: remembering words on cards
  hu TP: emlékezni a kártyák szavaira
  EN FP: remembering a birthday
  hu FP: emlékezni egy születésnapra
4856 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: tanár
  EN TS: The teacher is behind a wall of paper.
  hu TS: A tanár egy papírfal mögött van.
  EN FS: The teacher is behind a wall of books.
  hu FS: A tanár egy könyvfal mögött van.
  EN TP: a teacher marking papers
  hu TP: dolgozatokat javító tanár
  EN FP: a teacher reading a book
  hu FP: könyvet olvasó tanár
4857 | worker (noun): a person who works at a job | loc: munkás
  EN TS: The worker shook it, and now it works!
  hu TS: A munkás megrázta, és most működik!
  EN FS: The worker kicked it, and now it works!
  hu FS: A munkás megrúgta, és most működik!
  EN TP: a worker with a scanner
  hu TP: munkás szkennerrel
  EN FP: a worker with a hammer
  hu FP: munkás kalapáccsal
4858 | spiral (noun): a shape that curves round and round from a centre | loc: spirál
  EN TS: His domino spiral is enormous!
  hu TS: Óriási a dominóspirálja!
  EN FS: His domino tower is enormous!
  hu FS: Óriási a dominótornya!
  EN TP: a spiral of dominoes
  hu TP: dominóspirál
  EN FP: a spiral notebook
  hu FP: spirálfüzet
4859 | piece (noun): a separate part of something bigger | loc: darab
  EN TS: The pieces took over the room.
  hu TS: A darabok elfoglalták a szobát.
  EN FS: The toys took over the room.
  hu FS: A játékok elfoglalták a szobát.
  EN TP: fitting puzzle pieces
  hu TP: kirakós darabok illesztése
  EN FP: a piece of cake
  hu FP: egy darab torta
4860 | bubble (noun): a small ball of gas inside a liquid | loc: buborék
  EN TS: The tablet makes bubbles.
  hu TS: A tabletta buborékokat termel.
  EN FS: The tablet makes sparks.
  hu FS: A tabletta szikrákat termel.
  EN TP: bubbles in a glass
  hu TP: buborékok egy pohárban
  EN FP: a bubble of chewing gum
  hu FP: rágógumi-buborék
4861 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: hallgatni
  EN TS: Shh, she is listening!
  hu TS: Pszt, figyelmesen hallgat!
  EN FS: Shh, she is sleeping!
  hu FS: Pszt, alszik!
  EN TP: listening to a bird
  hu TP: egy madarat hallgat
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  hu FP: a tanárt hallgatja
4862 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: választani
  EN TS: She can't choose a pumpkin.
  hu TS: Nem tud tököt választani.
  EN FS: She can't choose a hat.
  hu FS: Nem tud kalapot választani.
  EN TP: choosing between two apples
  hu TP: választás két alma közül
  EN FP: choosing between two dresses
  hu FP: választás két ruha közül
4863 | plan (noun): a series of steps to reach a goal | loc: terv
  EN TS: Her plan fills the whole wall.
  hu TS: A terve az egész falat betölti.
  EN FS: Her plan fills the whole desk.
  hu FS: A terve az egész asztalt betölti.
  EN TP: a plan on the wall
  hu TP: terv a falon
  EN FP: a plan for a house
  hu FP: egy ház terve
4864 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: egyenruha
  EN TS: The band is in uniform!
  hu TS: A zenekar egyenruhában van!
  EN FS: The band is in pyjamas!
  hu FS: A zenekar pizsamában van!
  EN TP: a band in uniform
  hu TP: egyenruhás zenekar
  EN FP: a school uniform
  hu FP: iskolai egyenruha
4865 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: lencse
  EN TS: His camera has a long lens.
  hu TS: A fényképezőgépén hosszú lencse van.
  EN FS: His camera has a short lens.
  hu FS: A fényképezőgépén rövid lencse van.
  EN TP: a long camera lens
  hu TP: hosszú kameralencse
  EN FP: a lens in her glasses
  hu FP: lencse a szemüvegében
4866 | drone (noun): a small flying machine with a camera | loc: drón
  EN TS: A drone is hovering low. Nice shot!
  hu TS: Egy drón lebeg alacsonyan. Szép felvétel!
  EN FS: A bird is hovering low. Nice shot!
  hu FS: Egy madár lebeg alacsonyan. Szép felvétel!
  EN TP: a drone over the grass
  hu TP: drón a fű fölött
  EN FP: a drone in the studio
  hu FP: drón a stúdióban
4867 | thumb (noun): the short thick finger on your hand | loc: hüvelykujj
  EN TS: She is giving two thumbs up.
  hu TS: Mindkét hüvelykujjával felfelé mutat.
  EN FS: She is giving two thumbs down.
  hu FS: Mindkét hüvelykujjával lefelé mutat.
  EN TP: two thumbs up
  hu TP: két hüvelykujj felfelé
  EN FP: a thumb on guitar strings
  hu FP: hüvelykujj a gitárhúrokon
4868 | program (verb): to write a computer program | loc: programozni
  EN TS: They programmed it. It works!
  hu TS: Beprogramozták. Működik!
  EN FS: They programmed it. It broke!
  hu FS: Beprogramozták. Elromlott!
  EN TP: programming a new app
  hu TP: új app programozása
  EN FP: programming a washing machine
  hu FP: mosógép beprogramozása
4869 | design (noun): working out the form of something in a sketch | loc: terv | translator note: TS uses tervezés (designing as an activity); loc terv fits only the phrases
  EN TS: Design is her whole life.
  hu TS: A tervezés az egész élete.
  EN FS: Football is her whole life.
  hu FS: A foci az egész élete.
  EN TP: a logo design
  hu TP: logóterv
  EN FP: a tattoo design
  hu FP: tetoválásterv
4870 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: hab
  EN TS: His face is covered in foam.
  hu TS: Az arca csupa hab.
  EN FS: His face is covered in mud.
  hu FS: Az arca csupa sár.
  EN TP: foam on his cheek
  hu TP: hab az arcán
  EN FP: foam on a beer
  hu FP: hab a sörön
4871 | registration (noun): the act of signing up or enrolling | loc: regisztráció
  EN TS: The registration queue is endless.
  hu TS: Végtelen a regisztrációs sor.
  EN FS: The registration queue is empty.
  hu FS: Üres a regisztrációs sor.
  EN TP: a registration desk
  hu TP: regisztrációs pult
  EN FP: a car registration plate
  hu FP: autó rendszámtábla
4872 | rating (noun): a score showing the value of something | loc: értékelés
  EN TS: Such a "strict" rating: always five stars.
  hu TS: Micsoda „szigorú” értékelés: mindig öt csillag.
  EN FS: Such a "strict" rating: always one star.
  hu FS: Micsoda „szigorú” értékelés: mindig egy csillag.
  EN TP: a five-star rating
  hu TP: ötcsillagos értékelés
  EN FP: a one-star rating
  hu FP: egycsillagos értékelés
4873 | study (noun): using your mind to learn a subject by reading | loc: tanulás
  EN TS: She is lost in study.
  hu TS: Teljesen elmerült a tanulásban.
  EN FS: She is lost in a forest.
  hu FS: Teljesen eltévedt az erdőben.
  EN TP: deep in study
  hu TP: elmerülve a tanulásban
  EN FP: a medical study
  hu FP: orvosi tanulmány
4874 | traffic light (noun): the lights that tell cars to stop and go | loc: közlekedési lámpa
  EN TS: She stopped at a traffic light.
  hu TS: Megállt egy közlekedési lámpánál.
  EN FS: She stopped at a busy gas station.
  hu FS: Megállt egy forgalmas benzinkútnál.
  EN TP: stopped at a traffic light
  hu TP: megállva a közlekedési lámpánál
  EN FP: a red traffic light
  hu FP: piros közlekedési lámpa
4875 | truck (noun): a big road vehicle for hauling things | loc: kamion
  EN TS: The team is loading the truck.
  hu TS: A csapat pakolja a kamiont.
  EN FS: The team is loading the boat.
  hu FS: A csapat pakolja a hajót.
  EN TP: a truck full of boxes
  hu TP: dobozokkal teli kamion
  EN FP: a truck full of sand
  hu FP: homokkal teli kamion
4876 | smile (verb): to spread your lips to show you are pleased | loc: mosolyogni
  EN TS: Rain, but she is smiling.
  hu TS: Esik, de ő mosolyog.
  EN FS: Rain, but she is crying.
  hu FS: Esik, de ő sír.
  EN TP: smiling at a puppy
  hu TP: kiskutyára mosolyog
  EN FP: smiling at the bus driver
  hu FP: a buszsofőrre mosolyog
4877 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: ülni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Now everybody is sitting!
  hu TS: Most már mindenki ül!
  EN FS: Now everybody is standing!
  hu FS: Most már mindenki áll!
  EN TP: sitting in a full hall
  hu TP: ülés egy teli teremben
  EN FP: sitting in an empty bus
  hu FP: ülés egy üres buszon
4878 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: móló
  EN TS: This guy is diving off the pier.
  hu TS: Ez a srác fejest ugrik a mólóról.
  EN FS: This guy is diving off the boat.
  hu FS: Ez a srác fejest ugrik a hajóról.
  EN TP: diving off a wooden pier
  hu TP: fejes a fa mólóról
  EN FP: fishing off a wooden pier
  hu FP: horgászat a fa mólóról
4879 | competition (noun): an event where a winner is chosen | loc: verseny
  EN TS: She is lifting a car in this competition!
  hu TS: Egy autót emel ezen a versenyen!
  EN FS: She is lifting a bike in this competition!
  hu FS: Egy biciklit emel ezen a versenyen!
  EN TP: a strongwoman competition
  hu TP: erős nők versenye
  EN FP: a singing competition on TV
  hu FP: tévés énekverseny
4880 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: palack
  EN TS: A water bottle off the roof? Wild.
  hu TS: Vizes palack a tetőről? Durva.
  EN FS: A chair off the roof? Totally wild.
  hu FS: Egy szék a tetőről? Totál durva.
  EN TP: a big water bottle
  hu TP: nagy vizes palack
  EN FP: a baby's milk bottle
  hu FP: cumisüveg babának
4881 | bus (noun): a vehicle that carries many passengers | loc: busz
  EN TS: People are pushing a bus!
  hu TS: Az emberek egy buszt tolnak!
  EN FS: People are pushing a train!
  hu FS: Az emberek egy vonatot tolnak!
  EN TP: pushing a city bus
  hu TP: városi busz tolása
  EN FP: catching a city bus
  hu FP: városi busz elérése
4882 | aircraft (noun): a vehicle that can fly | loc: légi jármű
  EN TS: They are pulling an aircraft!
  hu TS: Egy egész légi járművet húznak!
  EN FS: They are pulling a truck!
  hu FS: Egy egész kamiont húznak!
  EN TP: pulling a huge aircraft
  hu TP: hatalmas légi jármű húzása
  EN FP: an aircraft taking off
  hu FP: felszálló légi jármű
4883 | reveal (verb): to make something visible for everyone to see | loc: felfedni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The doors reveal green hills.
  hu TS: Az ajtók zöld dombokat fednek fel.
  EN FS: The doors reveal a blue sea.
  hu FS: Az ajtók kék tengert fednek fel.
  EN TP: revealing a green valley
  hu TP: zöld völgyet fed fel
  EN FP: revealing a secret
  hu FP: titkot fed fel
4884 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: mutatni
  EN TS: Everybody is pointing up!
  hu TS: Mindenki felfelé mutat!
  EN FS: Everybody is pointing down!
  hu FS: Mindenki lefelé mutat!
  EN TP: pointing at the sky
  hu TP: az égre mutat
  EN FP: pointing at a map
  hu FP: a térképre mutat
4885 | street (noun): a road in a town lined with buildings | loc: utca
  EN TS: They are going up the street.
  hu TS: Felfelé mennek az utcán.
  EN FS: They are going up the stairs.
  hu FS: Felfelé mennek a lépcsőn.
  EN TP: a sunny cobbled street
  hu TP: napos macskaköves utca
  EN FP: a busy shopping street
  hu FP: forgalmas bevásárlóutca
4886 | steep (adjective): rising or falling very sharply, almost straight | loc: meredek
  EN TS: The path is so steep.
  hu TS: Olyan meredek az ösvény!
  EN FS: The path is so flat.
  hu FS: Olyan sík az ösvény!
  EN TP: a steep grassy path
  hu TP: meredek füves ösvény
  EN FP: a steep price
  hu FP: meredek ár
4887 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: keskeny
  EN TS: Whoa, this path is narrow!
  hu TS: Hűha, milyen keskeny ez az ösvény!
  EN FS: Whoa, this path is wide!
  hu FS: Hűha, milyen széles ez az ösvény!
  EN TP: a narrow canyon path
  hu TP: keskeny kanyonösvény
  EN FP: a narrow shop door
  hu FP: keskeny bolti ajtó
4888 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: mezítlábas | translator note: used the adverb mezítláb (loc mezítlábas is the adjective form, unnatural with a verb)
  EN TS: Everyone is walking barefoot!
  hu TS: Mindenki mezítláb sétál!
  EN FS: Everyone is running barefoot!
  hu FS: Mindenki mezítláb fut!
  EN TP: walking barefoot on the sand
  hu TP: mezítláb sétálni a homokban
  EN FP: barefoot on hot stones
  hu FP: mezítláb forró köveken
4889 | circular (adjective): having the shape of a circle | loc: kör alakú
  EN TS: The platform is circular.
  hu TS: A platform kör alakú.
  EN FS: The platform is square.
  hu FS: A platform négyzet alakú.
  EN TP: a circular white platform
  hu TP: kör alakú fehér platform
  EN FP: a circular letter
  hu FP: körlevél
4890 | circle (verb): to travel around something in a ring | loc: körözni
  EN TS: Everyone is circling the top.
  hu TS: Mindenki a búgócsiga körül köröz.
  EN FS: Everyone is circling the tree.
  hu FS: Mindenki a fa körül köröz.
  EN TP: circling a spinning top
  hu TP: körözés egy pörgő csiga körül
  EN FP: circling a football
  hu FP: körözés egy focilabda körül
4891 | campus (noun): the grounds and buildings of a university | loc: kampusz
  EN TS: The whole campus is leaning!
  hu TS: Az egész kampusz oldalra dől!
  EN FS: The whole campus is jumping!
  hu FS: Az egész kampusz ugrál!
  EN TP: students on the campus lawn
  hu TP: diákok a kampusz gyepén
  EN FP: a campus in the snow
  hu FP: kampusz a hóban
4892 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: rövidnadrág
  EN TS: Those swim shorts are so fast!
  hu TS: Ez a rövidnadrág iszonyú gyors!
  EN FS: Those swim fins are so fast!
  hu FS: Ez az uszony iszonyú gyors!
  EN TP: colourful swim shorts
  hu TP: színes úszó-rövidnadrág
  EN FP: shorts for football
  hu FP: rövidnadrág focihoz
4893 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: zsúfolt
  EN TS: Crowded to the very top!
  hu TS: Zsúfolt egészen a tetejéig!
  EN FS: Crowded only at the bottom!
  hu FS: Csak alul zsúfolt!
  EN TP: a crowded baseball stadium
  hu TP: zsúfolt baseballstadion
  EN FP: a crowded bus at night
  hu FP: zsúfolt éjszakai busz
4894 | still (adjective): completely without movement, like flat water | loc: mozdulatlan
  EN TS: Everyone is still. Very normal.
  hu TS: Mindenki mozdulatlan. Teljesen normális.
  EN FS: Everyone is dancing. Very normal.
  hu FS: Mindenki táncol. Teljesen normális.
  EN TP: still students in a hall
  hu TP: mozdulatlan diákok a teremben
  EN FP: still water in a lake
  hu FP: mozdulatlan víz a tóban
4895 | opposite (adjective): directly across from each other | loc: szemközti
  EN TS: They stand on opposite sides.
  hu TS: Egymással szemközti oldalon állnak.
  EN FS: They stand on the same side.
  hu FS: Ugyanazon az oldalon állnak.
  EN TP: on opposite sides
  hu TP: szemközti oldalakon
  EN FP: the opposite direction
  hu FP: az ellenkező irány
4896 | shadow (noun): the dark shape you make by blocking light | loc: árnyék
  EN TS: Everyone has a long shadow!
  hu TS: Mindenkinek hosszú az árnyéka!
  EN FS: Everyone has a long scarf!
  hu FS: Mindenkinek hosszú a sála!
  EN TP: long shadows on stones
  hu TP: hosszú árnyékok a köveken
  EN FP: shadows on a wall
  hu FP: árnyékok a falon
4897 | join (verb): to become part of a group | loc: csatlakozni
  EN TS: Everyone is joining the hug!
  hu TS: Mindenki csatlakozik az öleléshez!
  EN FS: Everyone is joining the dance!
  hu FS: Mindenki csatlakozik a tánchoz!
  EN TP: joining a group hug
  hu TP: csatlakozás egy csoportos öleléshez
  EN FP: joining a dance class
  hu FP: csatlakozás egy tánckurzushoz
4898 | panel (noun): a flat sheet that forms part of something | loc: panel
  EN TS: They are fitting glass panels.
  hu TS: Üvegpaneleket szerelnek be.
  EN FS: They are fitting wood panels.
  hu FS: Fapaneleket szerelnek be.
  EN TP: fitting glass panels
  hu TP: üvegpanelek beszerelése
  EN FP: cleaning glass panels
  hu FP: üvegpanelek tisztítása
4899 | enormous (adjective): extremely big | loc: hatalmas
  EN TS: That radish is enormous, dude!
  hu TS: Ez a retek hatalmas, tesó!
  EN FS: That melon is enormous, dude!
  hu FS: Ez a dinnye hatalmas, tesó!
  EN TP: an enormous white radish
  hu TP: hatalmas fehér retek
  EN FP: an enormous pumpkin
  hu FP: hatalmas tök
4900 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: halom
  EN TS: The tall stack fell over!
  hu TS: A magas halom ledőlt!
  EN FS: The tall tree fell over!
  hu FS: A magas fa ledőlt!
  EN TP: a tall stack of pallets
  hu TP: magas halom raklap
  EN FP: a stack of pancakes
  hu FP: egy halom palacsinta
4901 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: kék
  EN TS: Blue sea, blue sky, big dive.
  hu TS: Kék tenger, kék ég, nagy ugrás.
  EN FS: Blue pool, blue sky, big dive.
  hu FS: Kék medence, kék ég, nagy ugrás.
  EN TP: diving into blue water
  hu TP: fejes a kék vízbe
  EN FP: diving into a blue pool
  hu FP: fejes egy kék medencébe
4902 | submarine (noun): a warship that travels under water | loc: tengeralattjáró
  EN TS: A submarine, then a whale. Swim faster!
  hu TS: Egy tengeralattjáró, aztán egy bálna. Ússz gyorsabban!
  EN FS: A submarine, then a shark. Swim faster!
  hu FS: Egy tengeralattjáró, aztán egy cápa. Ússz gyorsabban!
  EN TP: a submarine in a lake
  hu TP: tengeralattjáró egy tóban
  EN FP: a submarine in a harbour
  hu FP: tengeralattjáró a kikötőben
4903 | crowd (verb): to gather closely in large numbers | loc: összezsúfolódni
  EN TS: Everyone is crowding the plaza. Why?
  hu TS: Mindenki összezsúfolódik a téren. Miért?
  EN FS: Cars are crowding the plaza. Why?
  hu FS: Az autók összezsúfolódnak a téren. Miért?
  EN TP: crowding into the square
  hu TP: összezsúfolódás a téren
  EN FP: crowding around a stage
  hu FP: tolongás egy színpad körül
